Although there are a few isolated reports in the literature suggesting that sugar beet pollen is highly antigenic, hypersensitivity to components of sugar beet is not a common disease.
We report a 29-year-old man with a history of atopic dermatitis who developed both contact dermatitis and allergic rhinitis from sugar beet pollen through his job in a seed nursery.
Establishing nursing science at German universities has become more and more consolidated.
At the beginning of this establishment there was an evident backlog especially compared to angloamerican and scandinavian countries.
Today - 1997 - more than 40 nursing science courses exist at German high schools and universities.
Active glucocorticoids (GCS), such as cortisol or corticosterone, are a prerequisite for the induction of surfactant synthesis in the fetal lung.
In fetal serum, biologically inactive metabolites (cortisone or 11-dehydrocorticosterone) outweigh the active forms.
In this study we demonstrate with organoid cultures of fetal rat lungs that the reductive side of 11-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase (11-HSD) regulates the intracellular activation of GCS.
The inhibition of 11-HSD by the licorice extract glycyrrhetinic acid completely inhibits this central metabolism.
On the other hand, GCS induce the reductive activity of 11-HSD and, therefore, they increase their own activation by positive feedback.
In a community sample of 394 eldery aged 61 years and older from East and West Germany, diseases, contacts with general practitioners and specialists, the use of medicine, attitudes regarding health and illness, the subjective health, psychic problems, social support, social integration, social burden, and socio-demographic variables were assessed.
Based on these data the determinants for the contact of physicians and the use of medicine were analyzed.
The results confirmed the frequency of multimorbidity in the elderly; on average we found three different diseases at the same time for each person.
In nearly 10% of the sample we found seven diagnoses existing at the same time.
88% had contact with a general practitioner at least once a year, 97% had contact either with a general practitioner or with a specialist once a year.
55.8% took at least one medicine each day.
The number of diseases existing at the same time was the most determining variable for the contact of physicians and the use of medicine.
Furthermore, the elderly had more contact with physicians and took more medicine if they thought they were susceptible to diseases in a high degree, and if they rated their own health as poor.
Fewer contacts with physicians and a lower use of medicine were found in those elderly that rated health behavior as little useful, that had low control beliefs regarding their own health, and that experienced only a low degree of health-related limitations in their everyday life.
Furthermore, we found a higher use of medicine if there was little social support.
There were no significant age-related or sex-related differences regarding the contact of practitioners or the use of medicine.
Inflammatory bowel diseases (IBD: Crohn's disease, ulcerative colitis) are chronic inflammatory and frequently relapsing diseases of the gut that ultimately lead to destruction of the intestinal tissue.
Recent evidence suggests that a pathologic activation of the mucosal immune system in response to antigens is a key factor in the pathogenesis of IBD.
Furthermore, changes in cell migration and cytokine production appear to contribute to the perpetuation of IBD and the postoperative recurrence of Crohn's disease.
Based on recent advances in our understanding of the pathogenesis of IBD, several new therapeutic strategies are currently being tested in clinical practice, including recombinant anti-inflammatory cytokines (IFN-, IL-10, IL-11) and inhibitors of cell adhesion molecules (ICAM), proinflammatory cytokines (TNF, IL-12) and their receptors (TNF, IL-6R).
Dysregulation of apoptosis may play a major role in the pathogenesis of systemic lupus erythematosus (SLE).
A defective clearance of apoptotic cells or inappropriately high rates of apoptosis may lead to a pathologic accumulation of abnormal cell material with a secondary autoimmune response.
Experimental findings in apoptotic keratinocytes and C1q knock-out mice suggest an important role of C1q in the clearance of apoptotic cell material.
In addition, there are several links between C1q and SLE: Most the patients with C1q deficiency develop a SLE-like syndrome.
SLE itself often causes secondary C1q deficiency and autoantibodies to C1q are detected in almost all patients with active lupus nephritis.
These observations suggest a central role of C1q in apoptosis and in the pathogenesis of SLE.
Objective: The aim of this study was to examine the causes and accident mechanisms that lead to injuries in infancy involving buggies and prams in order to establish strategies for accident prevention.
The discussion about the implementation of telemedicine and teleresourcing and its consequences has been under way for some time now.
The rate at which telemedical applications are being developed, leaves little time for consideration of the economic, scientific and social aspects.
There is a need for integration of all the existing fragments into one coherent telemedical concept.
Different aspects of telemedical concepts are discussed.
A 34-year-old woman who was separated from her husband, was killed by him by strangulation and several stab wounds in the chest.
The post-mortem examination was carried out approximately 5 h after death.
At the place of discovery one swab of her right and one of her left neck side were taken.
Additionally, a swab was taken out from the front side of the collar of her polo-neck pullover.
It was obvious that the skin of the neck below the larynx showed a fabric pattern leading to the assumption that the collar was temporarily pressed between the hands of the suspect and the neck of the victim.
DNA typing (short tandem repeat-PCR) of these swabs led to the detection of mixed patterns for the swabs of the neck and the collar which matched the patterns of the victim and the suspect.
A prospective randomized clinical trial was performed to evaluate the use of self-reinforced absorbable composites (Biofix) in the fixation of ankle fractures.
The aim of this study was to demonstrate that fixation with Biofix rods and screws is as good as the standard A. O. fixation.
The benefits of Biofix rods and screws are: a reduction in costs since no secondary operation is needed, prevention of stress-shielding and thereby diminishing the risk of bone porosity.
Patients aged between 16 and 75 years old with closed, non-comminuted fractures of the lateral and/or medial malleolus and dislocation of the fracture fragments greater thean 2 mm were included in the study.
22 patients were treated with Biofix rods and screws and the control group of 19 patients with a standard technique.
After 3, 6 and 12 months, rontgenograms were taken.
At the same time functional results were evaluated following the criteria of Olerud and Molander.
Two patients were withdrawn from the trial for non-medical reasons.
22 patients (12 from the Biofix group, 10 from the AO group) operated two or more years ago were contacted to see if any complications had occured since they were last seen.
In 4 cases a Biofix screw broke down just beneath the head during insertion.
This did not result in an insufficient fixation of the fracture.
There were no early post-operative complications.
The functional and rontgenological results in both groups were equal.
In three cases a sterile sinus developed at the site of screw insertion.
Biofix rods and screws, made of polylactic acid, are a good alternative for the fixation of fractures of the ankle.
The use of resorbable fracture fixation material has the advantage that a second operation to remove osteosynthesis material is not necessary.
The long term results are good.
There is, however, a possibility of development of tissue reaction to the resorbable material.
In current textbooks of dermatology, lichen amyloidosus is said to be a papular, intensely pruritic type of amyloidosis of unknown aetiology.
When this concept was developed, there was no way of discriminating between the different types of amyloid.
It is now known that amyloid in lichen amyloidosus is not derived from immunoglobulins or serum proteins, as it is in systemic amyloidoses, but from keratin peptides of necrotic keratinocytes.
Even several years ago, chronic scratching was invoked as a possible cause of damage to keratinocytes in lichen amyloidosus.
In support of this hypothesis, four cases are presented.
Apart from amyloid in the papillary layer, all biopsy specimens revealed histopathological signs of chronic scratching (epithelial hyperplasia with hypergranulosis and compact orthokeratosis, coarse collagen in vertical streaks in the stratum papillare), such as are also found in prurigo nodularis and lichen simplex chronicus.
Lichen amyloidosus is considered to be a variant of these conditions.
Just as in prurigo nodularis and lichen simplex chronicus, pruritus seems to be the cause and not a symptom of the papular skin lesions.
Consequently, treatment of lichen amyloidosus should not be directed at removing amyloid, but at improving the pruritus.
Ulcers in chronic venous insufficiency, especially in postthrombotic syndrome, are often resistant to compression therapy.
They can be treated effectively by the dermatologic surgeon with a fairly simple operative procedure.
The removal of the ulcer together with the extensive lipodermatosclerosis by Humby knife (shave-therapy) and immediate grafting with a meshed split skin graft - possibly in combination with ligation of insufficient perforator veins - yields very good success rates.
The results in 13 patients (18 legs) with an average follow up period of 11 months (up to 20 months) are reported.
The literature from 1990-1997 and 3 personal cases are reviewed to give an update on findings and current therapy for adder bites.
Bites of the adder (Vipera berus) are rare.
Symptomatic treatment usually leads to complete restitution, death due to adder bite is rare.
The main venom effect is the development of - sometimes severe - edema, hemolysis and disseminated coagulopathy, very occasionally followed by lethal renal failure.
Significant intoxication is very unlikely if 2-3 h after the incident, no signs of intoxication can be found.
Background: The use of high-tech communication is undoubtedly growing and has become established in almost all sciences and research fields.
This article surveys the possibilities for scientific data-exchange via the Internet, the world's largest computer network.
Selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRI) are known to exhibit far less cardiac side effects than tricyclic antidepressants.
We report three cases in which the SSRI, paroxetine, induced clinically relevant ECG changes in patients with high risk profile.
In two cases an increase in QTc time was observed, severe bradycardia was also observed twice.
Objective: Cultural detection of Bordetella pertussis is not very helpful in the management of patients with whooping cough, since culture takes three to five days until results are available, and only about 30-60% of patients may be detected by this method.
In order to improve the laboratory diagnosis of whooping cough, different protocols for the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) were developed.
With the introduction of each new technique for registering eye movements, the question arises concerning whether these provide a reliable and accurate alternative for the  diagnosis of labyrinthine dysfunction when compared to the most commonly used electro-oculographic technique.
To answer this question we compared mean slow-phase velocity (SPV) using three different recording techniques: electro-oculography (EOG), video-oculography (VOG) and infra-red oculography (IROG) during four different types of examinations.
The examinations were the eye target tracking test (ETT), horizontal and vertical optokinetic nystagmus (OKN) tests and the rotating chair test of the horizontal vestibulo-ocular reflex (HVOR).
For the ETT tests the VOG provided consistently higher mean SPV values with low variance, presumably because of the accuracy and stability of the calibration.
For the horizontal OKN and VOR rotating chair tests no significant differences were found between the mean SPV obtained with the different recording techniques, although the IROG recordings were associated with a larger variance.
Vertical OKN mean SPV was consistently lower with IROG and VOG techniques presumably because of non-linearities and resolution limitations inherent in these techniques.
These results indicate that the EOG technique despite its disadvantages of noise, time to apply and variability of calibration still provides an inexpensive, reliable and accurate means of measuring slow-phase eye movements.
Aim: The aim of this study was to investigate whether the plasma levels of the circulating adhesion molecules sICAM-1 and sE-selectin could serve as early predictors of developing sepsis and its severity.
Problem: The data model given in the  DICOM standard is examined unter the aspect of system integration.
Semantic properties of the IODs (information object definitions) and their relationships are investigated.
Thoracic disc herniation is rare.
Pain is the most common initial symptom, followed by sensory disturbances and motor involvement.
By the time of diagnosis, 90% of the patient have signs of spinal cord compression.
A 42-year-old woman was operated on because of shoulder pain.
During her stay in hospital, the patient first demonstrated uncharacteristic pain and after 2weeks an incomplete paraplegia caused by herniation of the T10/11 disc.
Degenerative changes have been considered to be a cause for spontaneous quadriceps tendon rupture.
Aim of this study is to investigate the microvasculature of the quadriceps tendon by injection techniques and immunohistochemical methods (antibodies against laminin) with regard to the pathogenesis of tendon degeneration.
The blood supply of the quadriceps tendon arises from descending branches of the lateral circumflex femoral artery, by branches of the descending geniculate artery and by branches of the medial and lateral superior geniculate arteries.
Blood vessels penetrate the tendon from the surrounding connective tissue and anastomose with a longitudinally orientated intraligamentous network.
Compared to the surrounding synovial layer, the amount of vessels in the tendon substance is greatly reduced.
The distribution of blood vessels within the quadriceps tendon is not homogenous.
The anterior or superficial part of the tendon has a complete vascular network that extends from the musculo-tendinous junction to the patella.
Within the deep portion of the quadriceps tendon there is an oval shaped avascular area which measures app.
30 mm in length and app.
Within this area the immunohistochemical proof of laminin is negative.
An explanation for the absence of blood vessels may be compressive stress caused by the patellar groove which serves as hypomochlion for the quadriceps tendon when the knee is flexed.
The occurrence of an avascular zone within the deep layer of the tendon that is directed to the joint cavity may explain the frequency of degenerative changes in this region.
When looking for the possible cause of distortions in values measured for the determination of breath ethanol concentration (BEC) in artificially respirated patients, consideration must be given to the humidity and temperature of the gas examined.
In the present study, the effects of humidified and warmed and of dry and cold air on the accuracy of a newly developed BEC measuring device, as compared to a reference model and to a conventional system, were examined in a lung model.
Total or partial relapses after conventional surgical advancement of the maxilla following Le Fort I osteotomy in CLP patients are frequent and major complications.
The aim of this investigation was to find out whether the technique of distraction osteogenesis in these patients shows more stability and whether maxillary distraction is able to replace conventional advancement.
Maxillary distraction was performed in 12 patients.
In two cases, a Delaire mask was used to bring the maxilla forward, ten patients were treated with the extraoral distraction device designed by Polley.
In all patients, planned advancement of the maxilla could be achieved; one partial relapse occurred.
The results indicate that distraction osteogenesis offers the possibility of advancement of the maxilla with the required stability.
The technique presents a major improvement which is achieved with a relatively minor surgical procedure.
We report a rare case of primary primitive neuroectodermal tumour of the bladder in an adult.
A huge tumour with extensions into pelvic and retroperitoneal tissue was found radiologically in a 62-year-old man.
The patient did not complain about remarkable clinical symptoms until 4 days before admission to hospital.
Histology of diagnostic transurethral tumour resection showed a small round-cell tumour with focal necrosis and scattered Homer-Wright rosettes.
Immunohistochemical analysis revealed that tumour cells stained positively with O13, a monoclonal antibody which recognizes the membrane glycoprotein p30/32MIC2.
Focally, tumour cells stained positively for vimentin, NSE, S-100 protein and synaptophysin.
The patient died 3 weeks later because of fulminant pulmonary embolism and autopsy revealed a huge, partly exophytic but mainly endophytic tumour of the bladder with extensions into the rectum and retroperitoneal tissue.
The differential diagnosis of small round-cell tumours in this location is discussed.
Lesions of the acetabular labrum should be treated by correcting the causes.
In a steep acetabulum where the femoral head brings the acetabular labrum under tension and traction, the acetabulum should be rotated by triple pelvic osteotomy to slightly overcorrected acetabular measurements.
Severely diminished acetabular and femoral anteversion can also lead to tears and impingement of the labrum.
Then rotation of the femoral neck and/or rotations of the acetabulum by triple osteotomy to 15-20  ° of anteversion are indicated.
Our triple osteotomy technique differs from that of others mainly in the ischial osteotomy.
It is performed from the posterior approach between the sciatic notch next to the ischial spine and the obturator foramen and is directed 20-30  ° anteriorly from the frontal (coronal) plane.
The osteotomies therefore are placed close enough to the acetabulum to allow free rotation, but they do not interfere with the circulation of the acetabulum, and the ligaments between the sacrum and ischium are left in normal tension.
Our normal values of the acetabular position were tested by correlating the measurements with the absence of pain.
The optimum is reached with a CE angle and a VCA angle of 30-35  °, an angle of the weight-bearing zone of +5 to -5  ° and a migration index of 10-15 %.
Overcorrections again caused pain and should be avoided.
Diminished anteversion of femur and acetabulum towards 0  ° also caused pain and should be corrected by triple and femoral osteotomy to 15-20  ° of anteversion.
In earlier follow-ups of 216 hips 5-10 years postoperatively, 82.3 % of the joints showed no change in the degree of osteoarthrosis.
Survival rate curves regarding the absence of pain demonstrated that pain was experienced again when joints were corrected insufficiently or overcorrected, while in good corrections the joints were free of pain in about 75 %.
Background: Leber's hereditary optic neuropathy is associated with point mutations in the mitochondrial DNA (mtDNA) that appear to be pathogenic for this disease.
These mutations affect nucleotide positions 3460, 11 778 and 14 484.
Heparin-induced thrombocytopenia type II (HIT type II) is an immunoglobulin-mediated, drug-induced side effect for heparin-treated patients with thromboembolic complications.
With an incidence of 1-3 %, mortality of 20 % it and permanent disability for another 20 % is a clinically relevant disorder.
With heparin treatment or prophylaxis frequent platelet count monitoring is necessary.
With HIT type II the thrombocytopenia is often a harbinger of thromboembolic complications in the venous or arterial system.
If HIT type II is suspected, further heparin exposure is to be stopped immediately and another anticoagulant therapy should be started.
The two anticoagulant options in Germany are discussed.
At the same time the diagnosis should be confirmed by laboratory testing, including testing for cross-reactivity with danaparoid.
Further therapy depends on the symptoms.
In the case of clinical relevance of this disorder we should think about prophylaxis: strict indications for perioperative prophylaxis only use of low-molecular-weight heparin (LMWH) for routine prophylaxis, use of LMWH for thrombosis treatment and early change to cumarine.
A patented low-temperature polymerization method for methylmethacrylate (MMA) infiltrated bone marrow biopsies is described: it has been developed from our previous MMA technique and is a patented procedure.
Differences from the previous method are (1) removal of stabilizer from the MMA monomer before its application, (2) the use of a different starter, (3) avoidance of O2 influence during polymerization by means of vacuum exchange with N2, and (4) polymerisation in a water bath to draw off residual heat.
After this procedure, all immunohistochemical reactions are possible provided that the previous fixation is adequate.
The effects of different fixatives are reviewed briefly without detailed analysis.
Technically, this plastic embedding can be performed at least as rapidly as the classic paraffin embedding after decalcification.
The advantages over the latter method are: (1) the cells can be better differentiated because semi-thin sections can be made; (2) the immunoreactions can also be performed on the basis of semi-thin sections, which means they can be interpreted more easily; (3) morphometric analyses yield more reliable results because of the constant thickness of sections; (4) osteological examination of bone trabeculae, especially the search for mineralisation deficiencies, is possible; (5) the plastic embedding procedure is less dependent on individual instabilities in the quality of performance of the staff members involved.
Furthermore, it is worth mentioning that the costs for additional equipment necessary remain below DM 100,000 including an excellent microtome.
The routine use of succinylcholine for endotracheal intubation is being increasingly questioned.
Initial studies have suggested that a combination of propofol and alfentanil without a muscle relaxant can provide good intubating conditions.
However, most of these initial studies either did not have a double-blind design or did not include a control group with muscle relaxants.
In this study, intubation conditions using fentanyl/propofol without a muscle relaxant were compared with the combinations of fentanyl/propofol/succinylcholine and sodium thiopental/succinylcholine.
Nosocomial pneumonia is still a common problem, especially in intubated and mechanically ventilated patients.
The endotracheal tube contributes substantially to the pathogenesis of pneumonia in these patients, because it facilitates microaspiration and impairs host defense.
Common nosocomial pathogens like Pseudomonas aeruginosa are known to produce exopolysaccharides and generate a complex biofilm structure, which allows adhesion to abiotic surfaces and protection against antibiotic action.
Multiple studies have identified bacterial biofilm on the inner lumen of endotracheal tubes, which represents a permanent source of infectious material.
Endotracheal tubes, removed from patients with ventilator-associated pneumonia, are covered more frequently with biofilm than those of uninfected controls.
It remains unclear whether this represents a source of infection or contamination.
Bacterial biofilm, however, may play an important role in recurrent pulmonary infections of the intubated and mechanically ventilated patient.
Computer-guided robot-assisted surgery in cementless total hip replacement requires exact preoperative planning at the 3D workstation Orthodoc.
Only the Robodoc procedure allows the precise execution of the preoperative plan in surgery.
Robot-assisted surgery has been undergoing clinical evaluation at the Berufsgenossenschaftliche Unfallklinik, Frankfurt, since November 1994.
In all 465 patients, the preoperative plan was successfully carried out intraoperatively.
The high precision in reaming, leading to a superb bone implant contact, guarentees absolute initial stability and is likely to promote primary healing between implant and bone.
The common and often published incidence of varus or valgus malpositioning and any fractures or fissures could be avoided through the use of Robodoc.
Although immediate full-weight bearing was strongly recommended to the patients, no implant subsidence was seen in the regular follow-up X ray studies.
In this study we describe 22 cases of retrograde ureteral stent placement in pregnant women with therapy-resistant flank pain due to hydronephrosis.
Eleven were primiparous and one patient expected twins.
Eight of 22 patients presented symptoms of pyelonephritis.
In 21 cases the hydronephrosis was located on the right and in 4 cases it was bilateral.
Maximal lower calix diameter was 12 mm (range 9-22 mm).
With the exception of two cases, sonographically controlled stent placement was performed under local anesthesia without sedation.
All patients were painfree within 6 days and were given prophylactic low dosis of antibiotic until the day of delivery.
Renal function remained within the normal limits.
Double-J stent displacement occured in 3 patients - of which one underwent nephrostomy.
Postnatal examination demonstrated urolithiasis in 4 of 19 patients.
This study provides evidence for effectiveness of retrograde ureteral Double-J stent placement as a therapeutic option in cases of severe symptomatic hydronephrosis during pregnancy with a low morbidity rate.
Between 1981 and 1994 at the Bergmannsheil Ruhr University Hospital in Bochum, Germany, we treated 145 patients with femoral diaphyseal nonunions following initial operative treatment.
Of these patients, 138 received this initial operative treatment at an outside institution.
The primary reconstructions for the fractures utilized plates in 112 cases, reamed nails in 24 cases and external fixators in 9 cases.
The average age of the patients was 35 years and the mean time from the initial operative treatment was 2 years.
Twenty-seven patients (19 %) presented with a hypertrophic nonunion and 118 (81 %) with an atrophic nonunion.
There was a significant correlation between primary "classic" plating and development of an atrophic nonunion (2-test: P < 0.01).
We observed 34 wound infections (23 %) with no significant correlation to the type of primary osteosynthesis.
We determined that 73 of the pseudarthroses were due to improper osteosynthesis techniques.
Of these cases, 41 % involved the use of plates, 83 % involved the use of reamed nails, and 78 % involved the use of external fixators.
Fracture location near the diaphyseal-metaphyseal junctions was common in this problematic group.
Ninety-two percent of all plates led to atrophic nonunions.
There were 21 open fractures and of these 90 % (n = 19) developed an atrophic pseudarthrosis and 29 % (n = 6) developed a wound infection.
Fifty-seven (39 %) of all patients had additional injuries, but we found that did not increase the risk of disturbed bone healing.
Our revision operations focused on the elimination of wound infections, refreshment of bone healing, and improvement in fragment stability.
Only 28 % of all "classic" plates and 11 % of all external fixators were changed to an intramedullary implant at the time of the first revision surgery.
Hypertrophic nonunions required a mean of 1.3 revision operations to achieve bone healing whereas a mean of 2 revision operations were necessary to fuse atrophic bone ends (P < 0.05).
In cases of diaphyseal pseudarthrosis healing time was not affected by the type of osteosynthesis used for primary reconstructions.
Since lack of fracture healing can often already be observed directly from postoperative X-rays, we recommend that revision procedures be performed early.
The prolonged length of time to care for femoral nonunions underlines the importance of appropriate primary fracture treatment.
That takes into consideration both the biomechanical and the biological aspects of bone healing.
Background: In a prospective trial (October 1996 - April 1998) the effect of octreotide and tamoxifen on the recurrence of pancreatic carcinoma after R0 resection was evaluated.
Methods: Patients with a local recurrence after curative resection of ductal adenocarcinoma of the pancreas were treated with 100 µg of octreotide three times a day and tamoxifen 20 mg once daily.
The median survival time, quality of life (EORTC-QLQ-30) and side effects of the octreotide-tamoxifen group were compared with a historic cohort (n = 14) of patients treated in our department (9/95-9/96) according to the "best supportive care" concept.
Results: Recurrences were diagnosed after R0 resection in a mean time of 13  +/-  6.8 months.
Patients treated with octreotide and tamoxifen had a significantly (P < 0.05) longer median survival time (7 months; range: 3-12) vs 3.5 months; range: 1.5-5).
The octreotide-tamoxifen group suffered less from lack of appetite, nausea, fatigue, and pain and needed fewer analgesies.
The only side effect of the octreotide-tamoxifen therapy was moderate diarrhoe in 2 patients at the beginning of the therapy.
Conclusion: Since combined therapy with octreotide and tamoxifen can be administered comfortably for outpatient treatment, this seems to represent progress in the palliative therapy of pancreatic cancer.
Objective: To study the influence of dopexamine on pulmonary shunt and hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction during major thoracic surgery with one-lung ventilation (OLV).
Design: Prospective, randomised, placebo-controlled study.
Patients: Twenty adult patients undergoing elective pulmonary resection.
Anaesthesia: General anaesthesia was performed using propofol, fentanyl, N2O and vecuronium.Volume-controlled ventilation was performed to maintain normocapnia over the whole investigation period.
During OLV, the tidal volume was reduced and the respiratory rate was increased to avoid a peak airway pressure exceeding 40 cm H2O.
Furthermore the FiO2 was increased to 1,0 and the external PEEP was removed during OLV.
Interventions: The patients received either dopexamine at 2 µg/kg/min (group A, n=10) or 0,9% saline as control (group B, n=10) after assessing the baseline values.
Measurement and results: The following cardiorespiratory variables were recorded: Heart rate, mean arterial pressure and mean pulmonary arterial pressure.
Cardiac output was measured by thermodilution using a continuous cardiac output thermodilution catheter.
Arterial and mixed venous blood gas analysis were measured from simultaneously drawn samples.
Cardiac index (CI), systemic vascular resistance index, pulmonary vascular resistance index, oxygen delivery index (DO2I), oxygen consumption index and the venous admixture were calculated using standard formula.
Furthermore, pressure-flow-curves were constructed to analyse flow independent changes in the pulmonary vascular resistance.
Data were recorded at the following times: After induction of anaesthesia in stable haemodynamics during two-lung ventilation (baseline values, T0), intraoperatively during one-lung ventilation (T1) and postoperatively after re-establishing two-lung ventilation (T2).
Patients characteristics, data from the preoperative lung function testing and surgical procedures did not differ significantly between the groups.
CI increased in the dopexamine group from 2,5 +/- 1,2 l - min-1 - m-2 (T0) to 3,6 +/- 0,9 l - min-1 - m-2 (T1) and 4,0 +/- 1,3 l - min-1 -  m-2 (T2).
The course of the intrapulmonary right-to-left shunting did not differ between the groups.
In the dopexamine-treated group the DO2I increased from 430 +/- 143 ml - min - m-2 (T0) to 652 +/- 255 ml - min - m-2 (T1) and 653 +/- 207 ml - min - m-2 (T2).
Regarding the pressure-flow-curves there was no difference during OLV between the two groups indicating no major blocking effect of dopexamine on hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction.
Conclusion: It is concluded that dopexamine can be used to improve haemodynamics and oxygen delivery during thoracic surgery without increasing venous admixture during one-lung ventilation.
Functional cine MRI of the pelvic floor is a yet another modality in addition to various radiological fluoroscopic techniques.
This article describes our own method in view of the recent literatur and provides morphometric reference values.
Background: The influence of cyanosis, and cardiac index in children with cyanotic heart disease on their growth velocity.
Regular examinations of prostitutes may reduce the incidence of sexually transmitted diseases in this high risk group.
Therefore since April 1988 regular mandatory examinations have been offered by the regional health office in cooperation with the Department of Dermatology of the Ruhr-University of Bochum.
The aim of this study was to evaluate the acceptance and efficiency of such an examination.
The study was based on anonymous questionnaires.
Mean age of the 80 prostitutes was 31.4; 67 of then were born in Germany.
78 of the women always used condoms, while 71 thought that condoms prevent STDs.
Three women suffered from a STD in the last 12 months.
The majority the women (75 from this 80 prostitutes) did not perceive the examination as discrimination, while 71 felt the examinations were of high quality.
These results indicate that regular mandatory examinations should be part of health prevention care of prostitutes and that they are well accepted and tolerated by these women.
Atrial fibrillation and related arrhythmias are common after cardiac surgery.
As more and more elderly patients are operated on for cardiac diseases, the interest in this arrhythmia is growing again.
There are some unresolved problems of this complication.
Reevaluation of atrial fibrillation after cardiac surgery by review of recent literature.
Usually postsurgical atrial fibrillation is transient, self-limiting, and benign.
Nevertheless, among patients affected by this arrhythmia, morbidity, mortality and costs by hospital stay are higher than without this complication.
In addition, postsurgical atrial fibrillation can increase morbidity and mortality by itself.
Today, general recommendations for prevention of atrial fibrillation following surgery do not exist but may be developed in the future.
According to the clinical course, therapy has to consider ventricular rate control, prevention of thromboembolic events, and rhythm control.
Usually therapy is restricted to the postoperative time.
Atrial fibrillation after cardiothoracic surgery has to be respected in order to minimize overall complication rate.
The influence of aspirin treatment on haemostasis is still under debate.
There are doubts in emergency operations, especially in transplant patients, concerning dosage and change in medication.
Our results are based on an analysis of the therapeutic approaches in German transplantation centres.
The question of transplant suitability, dosage and haemostatic effects are discussed with respect to the literature.
Some 92.11 % of the transplantation centres perform the operation even though the patient has been treated with aspirin.
In these cases an increased bleeding tendency is tolerated and observed in 34.2 % of the centres.
An increased mortality has not been reported.
Most of the transplantation centres accept a dosage of 100 mg aspirin daily.
Only 7.89 % of the transplantation centres refuse to operate on aspirin-treated patients.
Correctly indicated aspirin treatment (for cardiac arrhythmia, embolism, or thrombosis, for example) does not contraindicate renal transplantation (daily dosage up to 100 mg).
In elective surgery, however, a preoperative change in medication is recommended, e. g., the heparin instead of aspirin.
Full-thickness defects of the thoracic wall following tumor resection, irradiation damage or secondary wound healing in thoracic surgery require early interdisciplinary cooperation to achieve patient-specific treatment modalities.
Plastic surgical differential therapy allowing for sufficient soft tissue coverage, stabilisation of the thoracic wall and space filling in intrathoracic cavities, is presented and critically discussed.
Incomplete anaesthesia is a major clinical problem both in single spinal and in single epidural anaesthesia.
The clinical efficacy of epidural anaesthesia with augmentation (aEA) and combined epidural and spinal anesthesia (CSE) for cesarean section was investigated in a prospective randomized study on 45 patients.
This retrospective study presents the results of 41 patients with a lateral clavicle fracture eight years after the treatment at the Staatliche Orthopädische Klinik of the LMU München in the time between 31.10.1979 and 31.10.1994.
It could be shown that the lateral clavicle fractures, due to their variety, hold a special position among the clavicle fractures and thus need a differanciated therapeutic procedure.
Among the operation methods the K-wire stabilisaton with cerclage was the most often chosen operation technique i.e.
The K-wire without cerclage was used in two cases.
Twelfe fractures were treated with AO-plate-osteosynthesis.
Three fractures had to be treated by resection, as they produced two pseudarthrosis and one serious AC-arthrosis during the conservative therapy.
92,7% of the subjective results of the 41 checked up patients were good and very good.
The clinical follow-up of 36 and the radiological follow-up of 33 patients revealed in 97% a good and very good outcome in the Boenisch-Score.
Insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and multiple sclerosis are thought to stem from autoimmunological processes.
We describe a 14 year old female adolescent, in whom both diseases manifested almost at the same time.
A prospective long-term follow-up study in patients who had had surgical therapy for renal hyperparathyroidism was launched to investigate the results of surgical treatment and to evaluate possible correlations between preoperative laboratory values and the course of the symptoms.
From August 1987 to December 1995, 79 patients underwent surgery for renal hyperparathyroidism.
It was the first neck exploration for 72 patients.
Total parathyroidectomy with autotransplantation to a forearm was our preferred procedure (n = 67).
The postoperative course of all patients is known.
We carried out one to nine reexaminations (median 4) in 74 of 79 patients.
The follow-up period ranged from 1 month to 5 years with a median of 18 months.
After the operation transient hypocalcaemia occurred in 84.8 % of patients.
Postoperative hypocalcaemia correlated negatively with the preoperative levels of alkaline phosphatase and intact parathyroid hormone.
Within the first month after surgery 60 % of the preoperatively affected patients completely recovered from pruritus, whereas the skeletal syndrome took longer to disappear.
One year after surgery 75 % of the patients with pruritus and 79 % of those with skeletal syndrome had became asymptomatic.
After total parathyroidectomy with autotransplantation, patients with preoperatively elevated concentrations of alkaline phosphatase ( > 200 U/l) experienced faster relief from joint pain than patients with preoperatively normal concentrations (P = 0.0297).
To date 4.5 % of the patients developed recurrent hyperparathyroidism after total parathyroidectomy with autotransplantation.
Morbidity of surgery for renal hyperparathyroidism is influenced by patients' risk factors.
Postoperative hypocalcaemia correlates negatively with the grade of renal osteopathy at the time of operation.
Preoperative concentrations of alkaline phosphatase influence the rapidity of the relief from joint pain.
Coronary artery stenosis with need for therapy is rarely seen in childhood.
A 15-year-old girl with hypercholesterinaemia type II a was undergoing lipid aphereses therapy (once or twice a week) since she was 6 years old.
Single stage urthroplasty with an onlay patch graft of penile skin or buccal mucosa is an effective treatment for patients with complex anterior urethral stricture disease.
Using buccal mucosa, operative time is substantially reduced by using a two-team approach in which one team harvests the graft from the mouth while a perineal team simultaneously exposes and calibrates the stricture.
Excellent results can be expected using grafts urethral substitution in men with refractory bulbar strictures.
Focal areas of severe stenosis may be excised from the graft bed.
For patients with long or dense strictures, grafts may easily be combined with other tissue transfer techniques.
Background: As the slit-lamp technique is an restrictive method for the in-vivo examination and documentation of the multi-layer structure and the dynamics of the tear film and the cornea, e. g. during wound-healing processes, our aim was to find out whether it is possible to change the confocal laser scanning ophthalmoscope (CLSO; Zeiss) into a high-resolution confocal laser scanning microscope (CLSM) for the visualization of the anterior segments of the eye and the tear film by adapting a special objective system.
In order to gain information concerning the function of such a cornea microscope we examined selected patients with erosion or pterygium before and after operation and subsequent phototherapeutic keratectomy (PTK), as well as some in-vitro corneal surfaces after photorefractive keratectomy (PRK).
From 3 years' experience with nearly 100 transinguinal preperitoneal mesh prosthesis (TIPP) repairs for recurrent inguinal hernia the indication, anesthesia, modification of the technique, and results are reported.
After intraoperative classification of the hernia, the TIPP repair is indicated especially in large defects of the posterior wall (L/M III).
The procedure is easily performed under local anesthesia.
During 52 local TIPP repairs, conversion of anesthesia was never necessary.
Important technical details include the requirement for a sufficient size of mesh (10 cm x 15 cm) and a certain caudal and cranial fixation of the prosthesis using at least three interrupted stitches for each.
Apart from an increased number of seromas (12 %) in the early postoperative period, the results of the TIPP are comparable with those obtained after Shouldice repair for recurrent hernia.
The rate of hematomas, infections, and testicular complications range between 1 % and 3 %.
Considering the negative case selection of only large recurrent hernias, the TIPP repair reveals a favourably low 1-year recurrence rate of 1 %.
If representatives of the law suspect anyone of drug smuggling by internal bodily concealment and refers the person to hospital, the doctor is requested to recover the ingested drug packets by induction of emesis with syrup of ipecacuanha or apomorphin a.
The permission of this induction as a coercive measure is controversial.
The policemen, the public prosecutor or the judge has to decide, whether the induction of emesis is really necessary, the physician has to declare the risks.
Especially when there are only a few drug-containers and the person is no professial "body-packer", non-invasive diagnostic ways also can lead the evidence of incorporated drugs.
Rupture of the drug containers leads to acute intoxication and the physician must regard the person as his patient, he has to refuse the role as medical expert for the representatives of law.
The deformity in severe spondylolisthesis consists of two components: the parallel anterocaudad slip of the spondylolisthetic vertebra, and its tilt into kyphotic malposition.
The influence of the two components is very different: the anterocaudad slippage has not much impact on the sagittal profile of the spine and is easily compensated for by a slight increase in lumbar lordosis.
The kyphotic deformity has a high impact on trunk imbalance and the sagittal profile.
There are two compensation mechanisms: hyperlordosis of the lumbar spine to its anatomical extremes and - if that is not sufficient - verticalisation of the sacral bone, performed by contracture of the hamstrings and uprighting of the pelvis around the hip joints.
The latter mechanism is followed by functional disadvantages.
Therefore, correction of the kyphosis of L5 may be considered during operative treatment if the lumbosacral kyphosis (angle delta) is less than 85  ° and the sacral inclination less than 35  °.
The diagnosis of malalignments of the lower extremities includes analysis of the geometry of the whole leg.
The first step in the diagnostic process is a standardized physical examination.
It provides valuable background information for an effective radiological diagnosis.
Even with a thorough standardized physical examination it is not possible to define exactly the deformity or decide on an operative procedure.
The diagnosis of axis deviations in the frontal plane can be measured on a conventional plain X-ray of the whole leg.
In this view it is very important that the knee joints are in a true a. p. view independent on torsional deformities of the lower legs.
Today the gold standard to measure the torsion and length of the lower extremities is the CT scan.
However, the multitude of analytical methods for CT measurements described in the literature do not lend themselves readily to comparison; thus, it is difficult to identify a clear method of choice.
Not every CT measurement is better than a physical examination.
Evidence of reproducibility and accuracy is a prerequisite for useful interpretation of the results.
Up to this point in the literature there are only reference values for the Ulm CT Method.
One alternative is the MR scan, which avoids radiological risks, but the reproducibility and accuracy of the MRI method are not as good as for the CT method.
Another alternative is ultrasound, where recent advances in the measurement of torsion and length of the lower extremities have proven competitive with or superior to the accuracy of MRI.
The three-dimensional determination of the torsion and length of the lower extremities by ultrasound has now assumed a leading role in the non-radiological diagnosis of malalignments of the lower extremities in children and adolescents.
This method furthermore is increasingly being used in preoperative planning of leg deformities in adults.
Purpose: Management of organ-confined RCC is primarily surgical.
5-year survival rates of all stages improved from 40 % in the 1950th to 50 % in the 60th, and stagnate at 60 % in recent series.
Paramount use of ultrasound in modern medicine has been claimed to contribute significantly to an earlier detection of RCC thus better amenable for radical operation.
Other factors may have been strategies and general hospital care.
However, it remains unclear whether an extended lymph node dissection as suggested vy Robson in a seminal paper in the 1960th bears any therapeutic value.
Selected patients with minor lower limb injuries and low risk for deep vein thrombosis (DVT), who required cast immobilizing and did not receive medical thrombosis prophylaxis, were included in a prospective study.
The decision to give not medical thrombosis prophylaxis depended on an concept of individualised prophylaxis for patients at risk for thromboembolism.
From March 1994 to March 1996 in 178 outpatients (118 men, 60 women, mean age 25,8 [16-39] years) a clinical examination and a colour-coded duplex sonography were performed after removel of the cast for detection of DVT of the lower limb.
A phlebographie was performed when thrombosis was suspected.
Two patients developed a one bundle thrombosis of the calf.
Clinical appearance of lung embolism was not observed.
These results suggest, that low risk patients with minor injuries of the lower limb and plaster cast immobilisation do not need a medical thrombosis prophylaxis.
For the judgment of the quality of medical services and for the progress of clinical medicine the comparison of data and informations of the diagnostic and therapeutic process is demanded.
Therefore a systematic and concrete system of documentation should be implemented in every clinic, which consists of standard nomenclature, classification, instruments of outcome measure and documentation standards.
There are a group of problems and barriers which stand in the way of this goal.
It is useful to build a minimum basis data set which includes core criterias of clinical dokumentation in orthopedic surgery and include this in an information system so that all of these parts are considered and that a central and comparable data pool is offered for patient care, quality management and research.
Basal cell adenocarcinoma was first introduced as an entity in the second edition of the WHO's "Histologic Typing of Salivary Gland Tumours" in 1991.
This tumor was first described in 1990 by Ellis and Wiskovitch from the Armed Forces Institute of Pathology (AFIP).
Basal cell adenocarcinoma accounts for about 2.9% of all salivary gland malignancies.
More than 90% of the tumors are situated in the parotid gland.
Intraoral manifestations are known from case reports only.
Tumors of the palate have been mentioned in three cases.
Histologically this tumor can be easily confused with basal cell adenoma and the solid basaloid subtype of adenoid cystic carcinoma.
The case presented here is a middle-aged white woman with a basal cell adenocarcinoma of the palate.
Therapy consisted of surgical extirpation with three-dimensional safety margins and histologically proven clear resection margins.
Knowledge at this point indicates that basal cell adenocarcinoma has a rather high probability of local recurrence (up to 50%) and a mostly lymphogenous metastatic potential for as long as  10 years after removal of the primary tumor.
Ten year survival is around 75%.
Purpose: To study the incidence and shape of subclinical keratoconus with corneal topography in the fellow eye in the case of clinically, slit-lamp biomicroscopically and topographically diagnosed unilateral disease.
Ischemic heart disease is the most frequent cause of death in industrialized countries.
This is a result of persistent risk factors and aging of the population.
Medical progress with application of conservative, surgical or interventional strategies indeed reduced the morbidity and mortality of arteriosclerotic diseases, but markedly increased the medical care costs.
The result is a discussion about the optimal use of the different therapeutic measures under consideration of the evidence based medicine.
The ileal conduit is a simple and safe supravesical urinary diversion with few postoperative complications.
In patients with liver disease with portal hypertension, however, the risk of recurrent, peracute conduit bleeding is increased.
While the diagnosis is simple, several therapeutic options are available.
In most cases the bleeding comes from stomal varices, that can be controlled with local sclerotherapy with 3% Ethoxyscerol or ligation of the bleeding vessel.
The resection of the part of the conduit carrying the varices is an option if bleeding is life threatening or the source cannot be localised.
If bleeding recurs excision of the conduit should be considered.
Malignant disease must be excluded as a bleeding source.
Objectives: The cardiotoxic properties of bupivacain have been well documented under in-vitro, as well as under in-vivio conditions.
A further mechanism of cardiovascular impairment by bupivacaine via the central nervous system gained investigational interest in animal studies.
The aim of our study was to demonstrate the effect of a ventriculocisternal perfusion of bupivacain on systemic hemodynamic variabels and their reversability by wash-out with mock-CSF.
In recent years, our knowledge concerning pathophysiological changes in brain metabolism after traumatic brain injury (TBI) has greatly expanded.
This, in turn, has enabled the development of specific pharmacological strategies for the supplementary treatment of brain-injured patients with the aim of reducing secondary brain damage.
The present article focuses on the pathophysiology of TBI and the possibilities for pharmacological intervention.
While some of the substances reviewed are presently used in the treatment of TBI, others are under experimental and clinical evaluation at different stages.
This study explored characteristic subjective experiences of schizophrenia.
A questionnaire for self-assessment of disturbances in several cognitive and perceptual areas (the Eppendorf Schizophrenia Inventory, or ESI) was constructed and administered to first-episode schizophrenics (SCHe, n=45), negative syndrome schizophrenics (SCHn, n=45), remitted schizophrenics (SCHr, n=24), depressives (DEP, n=43), alcoholics (ALK, n=48), obsessive-compulsive patients (ZWA, n=46), and healthy controls (KON, n=57).
Comparisons between the SCHe, SCHn, DEP, ALK, and ZWA groups and a subsequent factor analysis revealed four schizophrenia-specific dimensions: attention and speech impairment (AS), ideas of reference (IR), auditory uncertainty (AU), and deviant perception (DP).
Further analyses suggested that the AS syndrome may represent a mediating vulnerability factor while IR, AU, and DP probably are reversible episode indicators.
The results may contribute to refinements in the measurement of specific prepsychotic signs, thus facilitating the development of early intervention approaches.
Introduction: The conservative treatment of the most severe cases of keratoconjunctivitis sicca (KCS) can be sometimes frustrating.
Especially with an underlying autoimmunologic disorder, even the application of artificial tears as often as every 5 min may not prevent further damage to the ocular surface.
A microvascular transplantation of the autologous submandibular gland (SG) can be performed by a maxillo-facial surgeon as an alternative approach for those cases.
We report 2 years of ophthalmological experience with the results of this procedure.
Aims: The predominant cause of death due to oral cancer is the failure to control local tumor due to regional tumor recurrence.
The sequelae of surgical resection and high-dose irradiation cause substantial changes in head and neck anatomy, leading to considerable problems in the early morphological detection of recurrent disease.
Therefore, this study evaluates the verification of cancer recurrence by means of its pathologic glucose metabolism.
Materials and methods: We reviewed a total of 50 [18F]-2-fluordeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (18FDG-PET) investigations performed in 44 patients who had undergone surgical resection of oral cancer.
In 23 cases, re-staging (group A) was indicated due to suspicion of recurrent or secondary tumor manifestation.
In 27 cases, PET served as a screening procedure (group B).
Statistic evaluation included sensitivity, specifity, positive/negative predictive value and accuracy of 18FDG-PET for the detection of tumor manifestation.
Results: 18FDG-PET correctly identified 23 of 26 tumor sites (88%) in the re-staging group and 9 of 10 tumor sites (90%) in the screening group.
We encountered a total number of 16 false-positive foci with an increased 18FDG-uptake.
In six patients, 18FDG-PET detected tumor recurrence several months before a morphological correlative could be identified.
In 5 of these 6 patients, the PET findings for the latter tumor sites determined the patient's fate.
Specificity was 63% for local recurrence, 97% for secondary lymph node involvement and 90% for distant metastasis.
Conclusion: According to these data, 18FDG-PET is the most effective diagnostic tool in the follow-up of oral cancer patients to date.
Due to the high prevalence of recurrent disease in the follow-up of oral cancer, either the detection of early recurrence or the identification of additional, incurable tumors may add substantially to a rational therapeutic management.
We therefore recommend 18FDG-PET for screening and re-staging of recurrent oral cancer.
In over 80 % of patients with gastroesophageal reflux disease, the Nissen antireflux fundoplication gives good long-term results.
Dysphagia, inability to belch or vomit as well as the gas bloat syndrome are possible sequelae after fundoplication.
The frequency of these symptoms could be reduced by modification of the original Nissen-Rossetti fundoplication into the so-called "floppy" Nissen fundoplication, a short and loose wrap of mobilized gastric fundus.
Failures of the antireflux procedure are mainly due to disruption or displacement of the wrap with the telescope phenomenon.
Here, reoperation with refashioning of the original wrap may lead to same functional results like a primary fundoplication.
Technical alternatives may selectively be chosen, when gastroesophageal reflux disease is complicated by fixated hiatal hernia, esophageal shortening, or serious esophageal motility disorders.
Such specific anatomic or functional abnormalities are detected by preoperative endoscopy, barium swallow, 24-h pH monitoring, and manometry.
Alternative techniques are mainly transthoracic repairs, including the Nissen fundoplication, Collis gastroplasty, and the Belsey Mark IV.
Modifications of the 360  ° Nissen operation are partial fundoplications like the Hill repair and the Toupet dorsal fundoplication.
Because of a high failure rate in the long-term follow-up, application of the ligamentum teres cardiopexy and of the Angelchik prosthesis is not recommended.
We report a sporadic case of giant axonal neuropathy (GAN) starting in a 5-year-old boy with gait disturbance.
At the age of 10 years he showed signs of a sensomotoric polyneuropathy and central neurological symptoms: intention tremor, nystagmus and visual disturbance.
The boy also had curly hair.
Sural nerve biopsy showed many giant axons with accumulation of microfilaments, which were also found in cytoplasma of Schwann cells, endothelial cells and fibrocytes.
Similar changes were detected in endothelial cells of a muscle biopsy, which additionally displayed neurogenic atrophy and target fibers.
Immunohistochemically, desmin, vimentin, heat shock protein 70, and ubiquitin were not detectable in giant axons, which, however, contained neurofilament protein 68, 200 and  -tubulin.
Our case shows that careful ultrastructural examination of a muscle biopsy may point to the diagnosis of GAN.
The endoscopic release of the carpal ligament gives the opportunity to treat the carpal tunnel syndrome in a comfortable and minimal invasive way.
Between 1 October 1994 and 7 May 1995, 46 patients who underwent endoscopic surgery on 55 hands were documented in a prospective study.
The following results were taken from a questionnaire.
There were not any complaints, or the complaints were so much diminished that complete division of the carpal ligament could be viewed as accomplished in 51 of 55 cases.
There were continuing complaints in four cases, and after an additional check two patients were operated on again.
The advantage of the endoscopic method is the inconspicuous scar and the reduced postoperative disablement.
For surgical removal of a malignant choroid melanoma, it is necessary to reduce systolic blood pressure to around 50-60 mmHg in order to prevent choroidal haemorrhages.
However, blood pressure reduction is associated with the risk of cerebral ischaemia.
We report a patient with a malignant choroid melanoma in whom waves I and II of the brainstem auditory evoked potentials (BAEP) disappeared during surgery under controlled arterial hypotension and hypothermia (31.1 ° C).
The waves could be recorded again immediately after the mean arterial pressure was increased from 48 to 77 mmHg.
The oesophageal temperature had dropped by 0.3 ° C at this time.
The 2-channel electroencephalogram (EEG) showed no irregularities during this time period.
A bilateral, reversible, apparently blood-pressure-dependent loss of waves I and II during arterial hypotension despite a normal EEG has to our knowledge not been previously described in the literature.
The isolated loss of waves I and II with maintenance of waves III, IV, and V is unusual.
The literature contains reports of acoustic neurinoma patients in whom only wave V could be recorded.
This is regarded as an indication of continued impulse conduction despite the loss of waves I to IV.
Others have observed a patient with temporary and reversible loss of BAEP wave I due to vasospasm of the internal auditory artery that apparently occurred during or shortly after manipulation of the internal auditory meatus.
Assuming anatomic peculiarities in the blood supply to the generators of the BAEP waves, a stenosis of the basilar artery could be considered as the cause of the bilateral reversible loss of waves I and II.
Another potential source could be the induced hypothermia, but this does not seem very likely because the patient's temperature was 0.3 ° C lower at the return of the waves than at their loss.
In the syndrome arrhythmogenic right ventricular dysplasia cardiomyopathy, little is known to date about the mechanism for the development of arrhythmias.
In a group of 54 patients with documented ventricular tachycardia during longterm ECG recordings, the determinants for the development of VT and the relationship between signal-averaged ECG and the morphological characteristics of the disease are investigated.
The analysis of the long-term electrocardiographic data includes the measurement of RR-intervals 30, 15, 5, 1min and immediately before onset of the VT, the determination of the morphology of the previous ventricular premature beats, and the frequency of the atrial arrhythmias.
Normal values for the analysis of late potentials in the ECG signal accquisition with bidirectional filters between 40 and 300Hz were defined a maximum of 113ms for a QRS width, LAS of 38ms, and RMS40 of 16uV.
The analysis of the long-term ECG produced monomorphic VT in all cases without previous atrial arrhythmia and in only 4 cases with previous polymorphic ventricular premature beats.
A long-short phenomenon could only be proven in 4VT episodes.
In 84% of all tachycardias, no arrhythmia were found immediately before onset of the arrhythmic event.
According to the circadian clock, two peaks, mornings between 6 and 9h and evenings between 6 and 9h, could be determined.
In patients, who were recently diagnosed with ARVD, a significant shortening of the RR intervals before the onset of VT as an indication of an acceleration of the sinus rhythm was observed.
This effect could not be observed in patients with a past medical history of AVRD.
Late potentials were determined with a prevalence of 74% overall.
Increasingly, late potentials were observed with morphologically diffuse forms of the ARVD.
A correlation to the severity of spontaneous arrhythmias (ventricular, sustained or not sustained VT) could not be established.
In comparison to the origin of VT in coronary heart disease, previous arrhythmias play a less important role in arrhymogenic right ventricular dysplasia cardiomyopathy.
Most importantly, an intensified sympathetic tone before onset of VT and an increased prevalence of positive late potentials are observed.
We present the case of a 54-year-old male patient with a Syme amputation of his left leg following diabetic gangrene of the foot.
A  local infection of the stump was treated successfully with two  endoscopic debridements and lavage.
Additionally, the patient received local antibiotics by the application of antibiotic collagenous fleece and antibiotic chains.
This therapeutic management combined with early weight bearing led to a stable stump.
We describe an eighteen-months-old boy, who suffered from congenital vitium cordis, jejunalatresia, microcephaly, facial dysmorphies and psychomotor retardation in connection with a partial monosomy of the short arm of chromosome 8.
In most cases the genesis of brachial plexus palsy is traumatic, often because of bike accidents.
If physiotherapy and neurosurgical procedures such as nerve repair do not have the desired outcome, muscle transfer operations are possible.
The results of our favored transfer of the trapezius muscle to compensate paralysis of the deltoid muscle will be presented.
Preoperatively radiological, clinical and electromyographic examinations are necessary.
Our results are based upon the clinical and radiological check ups and the subjective assessment of the patients.
Thirty-one patients (7 female, 24 male) underwent a trapezius transfer between March 1994 and December 1996.
The average age was 29 years (range 18-46 years).
We performed the operations using a modification of Saha's technique.
With the patient in lateral decubitus position and protection of the opposite plexus, a sagital skin incision is the first step, followed by the preparation of trapezius and deltoid muscle as well as the bony parts of the shoulder (acromion, clavicle, scapular spine).
The deltoid origin is cut from the lateral third of the clavicle, the acromion and the lateral half of the scapular spine.
The next step is transection of the root of the acromion and the lateral clavicle.
After elevation of the remaining trapezius insertions from the clavicle and scapular spine, the proximal humerus is exposured by splitting the partly detached deltoid muscle longitudinally.
Then the acromion fragment and humerus are prepared for the bone-to-bone contact.
In 90  ° of abduction the acromion fragment with its trapezius insertion is transferred and fixed to the humerus with two 4.5-mm screws.
Finally the deltoid is sutured on the top of the trapezius and the skin is closed over two suction drains.
Postoperatively we immobilize the operated arm in an abduction support for 6 weeks.
The physiotherapy program starts on the first postoperative day with active training of elbow, hand and fingers and electrostimulation of the transferred trapezius muscle.
Six weeks after the procedure we take an X-ray and start with progressive adduction of the arm.
The preoperative subluxation of the humeral head was abolished in all cases.
We achieved an average increase of active abduction from 7.3  ° (range 0-45  °) preoperatively to 39.2  ° (range 25  °-80  °) 1 year after the operation; the increase of forward flexion was from 20  ° (range 0  °-85  °) to 43  ° (range 20  °-90  °).
All patients were satisfied with the improvement of stability and function of the operated shoulder.
Finally we can conclude that the trapezius transfer for flail shoulder gives a satisfactory outcome regarding shoulder function and stability as well as the subjective situation of the patients.
We analyzed psychiatric and criminological data from 103 arsonists.
The following criticisms of the definition of pyromania according to DSM-III-R and IDC-10 seem appropriate.
First, the categoric exclusion of aggressive motives does not seem very promising, since approximately one fourth of arsonists whose firesetting is based on motives quoted in DSM-III-R may also have an aggressive motive.
Second, ICD-10 gives being drunk and alcoholism as a criterion for the exclusion of pyromania.
This seems untenable, since the behavior classed as pyromania is largely a product of alcohol misuse.
Repeated firesetting, resulting from being fascinated by fire etc., may be less a disturbance of impulse control but rather the manifestation of a psychoinfantilism, which, supported by alcohol abuse, extends into older age.
The mean age of such arsonists is slightly above 20 years.
The tendency for relapses after imprisonment seems to be low; this tendency probably decreases spontaneously in older age.
The mean age of arsonists with aggressive motives is a little below 30 years, those setting fire with suicidal motives have a mean age of 35, deluded arsonists have a mean age of 40 years.
Concrete sexual motives are relatively rare.
Approximately 50 % of arsonists have a purely aggressive motive.
Retaliation is a rare cause, however, since most of them do not even know the victims.
One third of these persons set the fire in their own homes.
Most arsonists show a personality disorder, with insecurity and narcissism predominating.
Data on firesetting are to be treated with caution, since two thirds of all cases are newer resolved; one fourth of cases concern minors, and in Central Europe arsonists with rational motives are hardly ever referred to psychiatrists.
A normal ciliary beat frequency of ciliated cells is necessary for the mucociliary clearance of the nose and paranasal sinuses.
An in vitro investigation was performed to eval-uate the influence of topical corticosteroids and antihistamines on the ciliary beat frequency of human nasal mucosa.
The nasal sprays examined contained the corticosteroids budesonide or fluticasone propionate and the topical antihistamines azelastine or levocabastine.
All tests were performed on cell cultures of human nasal mucosa during constant conditions.
Three of the four nasal sprays tested contained benzalkonium chloride as preservative.
An irreversible cessation of ciliary movement was observed in all cells exposed to nasal sprays containing benzalkonium chloride in a 50 per cent solution.
The nasal spray containing budesonide was benzalkonium chloride-free and caused minor but fully reversible decreases in ciliary beat frequency after 20 min.
As benzalkonium chloride can cause complete standstill of ciliary beat frequency in vitro in human nasal mucosa, we recommend that this preservative should not be used anymore in topical nasal medications.
The treatment of patients with severe burn injuries is expensive and belongs in the hands of specialized burn centres.
In our burn centre 257 patients were treated from 1991 to June 1995 (between 50 and 60 patients per year except for 1993 with 77 patients).
Patients were evaluated according to the ABSI score (mean 7) and had mortality of around 15%.
The costs range between 3.7 and 4.8 million DM per year, the profit lies in the same range.
The costs are divided into staff costs (1.4 - 1.8 million DM per year), costs for medical treatment (1.5 - 1.9 million DM per year) and costs for internal services (600 000 - 900 000 DM per year) such as laboratory examinations (247 000 - 386 000 DM per year) and blood bank (100 000 - 215 000 DM per year), the main factors in this category.
The different fields of costs and profit are compared in this analysis.
Possible ways of reducing costs are pointed out, and the question of effectiveness of therapy is discussed.
Conclusions from this analysis are limited by the individuality of each case with different clinical courses, the great number of influencing factors and the comparably small numbers of patients.
In benign laryngotracheal stenosis the amount of respiratory deterioration rather than the crude morphologic appearance will determine whether or not surgical measures such as dilatation or resection should be applied.
This review focusses on currently available and newly developed diagnostic tools to assess the functional importance of central airway obstruction.
After an outline of upper airway physiology is formulated, spirometric measurements at rest are collected.
Among these, Peak Expiratory Flow Rate (PEF) proved to be the simplest and most reliable parameter to monitor an obstructing lesion of the upper airways.
A novel technique for fibrobronchoscopic assessment of glottic and tracheal resistance is presented in detail.
In contrast to usual tests of total airflow resistance which cannot distinguish between central and peripheral contributions, this test identifies the pressure-flow-relationship created exclusively by the local lesion.
In serial stenoses, it indicates which is of higher clinical impact.
Patients with upper airway obstruction complain of impaired exercise capacity.
They tend to hypoventilate with imminent respiratory muscle fatigue.
Therefore, spiroergometry may play a role in defining the point of incomplete compensation of a central load.
The decision to operate will depend upon up the degree of physical capacity required to compensate for the stenosis.
Stroke units are hospital-based special wards aiming at optimal care by a specialized team with an integrated concept for patients with acute strokes.
Following the initial neurolo-gical and neuroradiological evaluation, early treatment will be initiated based on the assumed pathophysiology of the stroke.
Acute management includes monitoring of physiological, parameters, care by specialized nurses, and early implementation of physiotherapists, speech therapy and occupational therapy.
Despite the increased initial costs, the long-term burden for the health system is decreased by shorter hospital stay and reduced morbidity and disability.
Heparin-induced thrombocytopenia (HIT) is the most important side-effect of heparin therapy.
Two types of thrombocytopenia can be caused by heparin: a frequent non-immunologic type causing a minor decrease in thrombocyte count without apparent clinical importance and, on the other hand, an immunologic type accompanied by thromboembolic complications.
Patients and methods: We report on two cases with HIT type II after coronary artery bypass grafting (CABG).
HIT antibodies were demonstrated by ELISA for platelet-factor-4-heparin-complex and heparin-induced platelet-activation (HIPA) assay.
Results: A 67 year old patient suffered from a HIT type II seven days after administration of heparin during myocardial revascularization.
In this patient, a continuous fever and a signicantly reduced general condition were the primary symptoms.
The clinical picture of this disease was reversible after aborting the heparin therapy.
Thromboembolic complications did not occur.
A 70 year old patient developed a HIT type II with thromboembolic complications 13 days after CABG.
The vascular occlusions affected the A. spinalis anterior with the development of a spinalis anterior-syndrome, the coronary arteries with the development of myocadial infarction, and the A. iliaca interna.
A white-clot syndrome with thrombi in the ascending aorta, in the left atrium, and in the left ventricle required an operation with extracorporal circulation including the use of recombinant hirudin for anticoagulation.
Conclusion: With therapy with heparin, it is obligatory to check platelet count.
An indication for the development of HIT type II is a decrease in platelet count or thromboembolic complications during heparin therapy.
In the case of HIT type II recombinant hirudin was a practical altenative as an anticoagulant for extracorporal circulation and for continous hemofiltration.
Oxygen radicals and oxygen radial mediators are thought to be important components in the development of acute lung injury, sepsis, and multiple organ failure.
Injured patients, patients with pulmonary diseases, and multiple trauma patients also showed an elevated lipid peroxidation, indicating increased oxidant stress.
N-Acetylcysteine (NAC) has been used as an antioxidant in a wide variety of experiments.
NAC has been suggested to act by raising concentrations of cysteine, and hence glutathione, and by scavenging of oxidant species [1, 11, 17, 29].
The present study was designed to investigate whether the application of NAC in intubated patients has an effect on concentrations of reduced glutathione in plasma and bronchoalveolar lavage fluid (BAL) and on the lipid peroxidation products malondialdehyde and conjugated dienes.
Because NAC has been widely used as a mucolytic drug for the treatment of lung diseases, the influence on tracheobronchial mucus was studied, too.
Between 1990 and 1995, 27 patients with posttraumatic disorders of the subtalar joint were treated by correcting fusion.
Preoperatively 24 patients (88.89 %) suffered from pain; 15 (55.56 %) had a walking range below 100 m. Seven patients were unable to work in their original profession.
After an average period of 13.85 months postoperatively the patients were examined again.
At this time 18 (66.67 %) had no or minimal pain; 19 (70.37 %) had no claudication.
According to the score of Angus and Skuginna, in 81.48 % of patients the result of the correcting arthrodesis was successful; according to Kitaoka's clinical rating system for ankle-hindfoot, midfoot, hallux and lesser toes, the average postoperative score was 75.8 points.
Objective: To examine changes in Body Mass Index (BMI) in children in the last twenty years and to determine the prevalence of overweight and obesity.
The review of medication has been recommended as an important part in preventing falls.
In a random sample of 276 hospital in-patients aged 75 and over, the frequency of prescribed drugs which may increase the risk of falling by causing dizziness was assessed.
Questions about dizziness and previous falls were included in a standardized questionnaire.
Migration of an impacted mandibular premolar is a rare finding, whereas dystopia of lower jaw cuspids is described much more often in the literature.
We present a patient in whom radiographic studies show the migration of a mandibular premolar to the muscular process over a period of 14 years.
Most of the tooth migration along the vertical portion of the mandibula into the processus muscularis took place after the root development had ended.
Neither radiological nor clinical examination revealed the stimulus which changed the path and the direction of the impacted tooth.
In atopic eczema patients the well-known abnormal cutaneous reactivity of the blood vessels (white dermographism, delayed blanch after acetylcholine, paradoxical blanching after nicotinic acid application and diminished erythema after histamine injection) were observed during acute eczematous episodes and later in an eczema-free state in comparison with controls.
In this follow-up study the use of different stimuli allowed us to demonstrate abnormal cutaneous vascular reactions in the patients depending on the severity of their atopic eczema.
Severely affected patients showed persistence of the paradoxical vascular reactions even in an eczema-free cutaneous state.
We report on a 9-year-old girl with a giant cell fibroblastoma of the right anterior chest wall.
This rare soft tissue tumour occurs predominantly in the first two decades of life.
The typical clinical presentation is a solitary, usually 2-6 cm large, non-tender mass of blue-greyish colour which is mostly located on the back, anterior chest wall, thigh or groin.
The histology shows a loose infiltrate of predominantly bland spindle cells in dermis and subcutis.
Characteristic elements of the tumour are large angiectoid branching spaces lacking any endo- or epithelium, and relatively small multinucleated cells (floret cells).
The recurrence rate is high if the tumour is not excised with adequate safety margins.
It is of pre-eminent importance to differentiate this rare benign tumor from sarcomas, in order to avoid an inappropriately aggressive therapy.
To correct severe septal deformities, it is often necessary to perform an extracorporal septoplasty with temporary removal of the deviated septal cartilage, followed by straightening and reimplantation into the nose as free graft.
The utilization of a compound graft, which sutures the cartilage fragments to a resorbable polydioxanon (PDS) foil, facilitates this technique immediately while simultaneously ensuring support of the nasal dorsum.
Stress incontinence is the most frequent form of incontinence found in females.
The usual method of surgery for this is to lift the bladder neck towards cranial and ventral.
Two competitive techniques - bladder neck suspension in accordance with Stamey and colposuspension in accordance with Burch - were retrospectively investigated.
A total of 95 women underwent surgery and it was possible to evaluate the postoperative course in 46 and 30 (total 76) patients respectively.
Initially, both surgical techniques demonstrated a very good success rate (91.3 % and 96.7 % resp.).
However, the continence rate of the Stamey patients deteriorated after 6 weeks down to 78.3 % and after more than 2 years only 28.6 % of these patients were still completely continent (mean follow-up 40.4 mths), whereas deterioration in the Burch patients was only 87 % (mean follow-up 44.25 mths).
The disappointing results with the Stamey technique did not correlate with the degree of initial continence.
It was noted here that obese patients showed a greater tendency towards regression.
The three cases of recurring incontinence after Burch colposuspension were already relapses at the time of surgery.
With respect to long-term follow-up, our results with the Stamey method were distinctly poorer than with the Burch technique.
Therefore, in our opinion, the Burch colposuspension procedure and fascioplasty should be the method of choice for the management of stress incontinence.
This paper is concerned with the relationship between social inequality and psychiatric disorders, an issue being neglected in German psychiatry for a long time.
Social inequality will be discussed in it's dimensions "socioeconomic status" and "sex" referring to the present state of epidemiological and sociological knowledge.
Because such macrosocial factors offer little explanation for the association with psychiatric disorders by themselves microsocial concepts of burden and resources are necessary to link the structural and the individual level.
These concepts are considered to be one pathway by which the mechanisms to disease may occur.
A short review of empirical findings and analytic approaches show the complexity of these mechanisms requiering further research not only because of analytic deficiences but also because of social change.
Further research will concern in general the explanation of social patterns of diseases, in detail the link between individual stress and coping with the social structure, and last but not least a gender-sensitive approach to psychiatric disorders which is more differenciated.
It is well known that alterations to the oral cavity caused by dental prostheses may affect speech articulation, although influences on the voice are not assumed.
In addition to the vocal fundamental frequency, vibrations of the vocal chords generate overtones.
Through the shape of the larynx and the upper airway, resonances and antiresonances are formed, and in this way overtones are amplified to a variable extent.
Nozzle changes caused by a dental prosthesis in the oral cavity may possibly influence overtones but influences on the vocal fundamental frequency seem unlikely.
The influence of dental prostheses on the voice is demonstrated in a patient who owned two different dental prostheses.
The fundamental frequency rose by up to five semitones during speech and his vocal range increased by up to four semitones when a thin denture was used instead of a normal denture.
When the position of the mandible was checked by intraoral needle point placement, a more rostral position of the mandible was recorded with the thin denture than with the normal denture.
Sagittal magnetic resonance tomography imaging also showed that the larynx was in a more cranial position.
This change was presumed to be due to an upward movement of the larynx induced by the tongue, which itself was found to be in a more cranial position with the thin denture.
In this situation, increased tension of the laryngeal muscles were believed to induce a rise in fundamental frequency, shifting the voice range toward higher frequencies.
These findings show that dental prostheses can cause vocal changes in individual cases.
The etiology of this occurrence is still not clear.
Its consequences, however, should be known to the dentist, ENT surgeon and phoniatrist if patients notice changes in their voice after having altered or replaced their dentures.
Cytokine blood levels are found to be moderately elevated in chronic heart failure, as a function of severity of disease.
The source of these cytokines and the trigger mechanisms stimulating cytokine release are a matter of intense research.
Potential players include bacterial endotoxin from intestinal translocation, a neurohumoral dysbalance with an enhanced sympathetic tone or an overspill of cytoines from the failing heart itself.
We present arguments in favor of a direct link between the chronically enhanced sympathetic tone in heart failure and the clinically over activation of the immune system, particularly interleukin 6 release.
Objectives: This 1998 survey was carried out on the use of the sitting position for neurosurgical procedures in the posterior fossa and operations of the craniospinal and cervical spine region by the dorsal approach.
In addition, anesthetic management of the sitting position and the compliance with recommendations of the Neuroanesthesia Study Group of the German Society of Anesthesiology and Intensive Care Medicine (DGAI) published in 1995 were investigated and compared to results of a 1995 survey.
Polar body analysis is a perfect tool to exclude genetically altered oocytes prior to fertilisation.
This helps to improve pregnancy rates and baby take home rates in assisted reproduction, primarily in advanced maternal age patients.
This might reduce the need of invasive prenatal diagnosis for those patients.
Polar body analysis offers treatment in reproductive medicine for female patients carrying a chromosomal aberration or a mutation before they become pregnant.
However, it does not assess the genetic status of the embryo resulting from the oocyte tested and selected.
The paternal contribution to the embryo is left unattended.
Ethical considerations do not play a role, since no manipulation or selection is performed on embryos.
Pachydermoperiostosis (Friedreich-Erb-Arnold syndrome, Touraine-Solente-Golé syndrome) is a rare disease with an autosomal dominant mode of unheritance; it occurs almost exclusively in men.
A report of typical pachydermoperiostosis in a 31-year-old man is presented.
Associated features were clubbed digits of the hands and feet with watch-crystal nails, thickening of the skin and soft tissues, hyperhidrosis of hands and feet, hyperplasia of the sebaceous glands with seborrhoea, gynaecomastia, and ophthalmic abnormalities that had been present since puberty.
Radiological examination revealed periosteal hyperostosis of the short and long bones.
Endocrine disturbances were not detected.
Skin biopsies showed hypertrophy of the skin and skin appendages.
Primary (idiopathic, hereditary) pachydermoperiostosis should be distinguished from secondary (symptomatic) forms of the disease, which are often associated with lung tumours.
The following review will examine the outcome of psychotherapy and pharmacotherapy treatment studies of anorexia and bulimia nervosa.
For both eating disorders, psychotherapy is the treatment of choice.
In clinical practice "treatment packages" are offered to account for the complexity of the disorders.
In bulimia nervosa, cognitive-behavioral therapy techniques have dominated the literature and appear to be successful.
Newer studies reporting on the use of interpersonal therapy also find considerable improvement of symptoms.
Antidepressive medication can be useful in the treatment of bulimia nervosa.
Recently, a stepped care approach to treatment has been recommended, with self-care manuals as the first step.
In anorexia nervosa there is a paucity of controlled clinical trials.
Contingency management for weight restoration can be viewed as a necessary element in all in- and outpatient treatments.
Family therapy, cognitive-behavioral therapy, and psychodynamic approaches have proven useful in clinical practice; however, only a limited data base exists regarding the efficacy of these therapies.
Medication should not be used routinely in the treatment of anorexia nervosa.
Absorption of irrigating fluid in transurethral prostatic resection (TURP) and percutaneous nephrolitholapaxy (PNL) into veins or delayed absorption due to fluid extravasation may result in a TURP syndrome.
The measurement of end-tidal breath alcohol concentration (et AC) as a monitor of absorption of irrigating fluid labelled with 2% ethanol is limited by the disturbance of infrared sensors by volatile anaesthetics and nitrous oxide (N2O) (Fig.
An electrochemical sensor is acceptable for this method.
The aim of the present study was the evaluation of breath alcohol measurements using an electrochemical sensor device (Alcomed 3010, Envitec).
The stability of the sensor in the presence of volatile anaesthetics was examined using a lung model.
In a clinical investigation, the device was then applied to spontaneously breathing or mechanically ventilated patients inhaling volatile anaesthetics during endoscopic urological surgery.
Skin diseases, the psyche and psychological changes are often intertwined, especially in patients presenting for expert dermatologic opinion.
In many cases an additional evaluation provided by psychotherapeutic medicine may be necessary.
This resource may help with the diagnosis, explanation of the problem and estimation of the degree of disability.
The different legal guidelines of the various evaluation boards must be considered.
The role of psychotherapeutic evaluation is demonstrated through case examples.
The evaluation of new possibly occupationally-related disorders such as multiple chemical sensitivity and mobbing is considered.
We investigated the impact of old age on the antidepressant effect of sleep deprivation.
32 depressive inpatients were assessed before and after sleep deprivation by the Hamilton Depression Rating Scale.
The patients were divided into two groups according to their age.
The result showed no negative impact of old age on the anti-depressant effect of sleep deprivation.
During MRI-controlled resection of brain tumors using an open MRI system, operation-induced alterations may occur, especially enhancement of the resection cavity wall.
This may simulate tumor areas, resulting in false assessment of the resection or resection of non-tumorous areas.
Based on 42 MRI- and biopsy-controlled brain tumor resections in an 0.5 T open MRI (Signa SP, GE), the appearance and origin of operation-induced reactions are analyzed.
In our opinion, there is a superposition of preformed peritumoral reactions by operation-induced microcontusions.
The beginning of the cavity wall enhancement needs at least 10-15 min.
MRI-controlled analysis of the intraoperative steps by the neurosurgeon and neuroradiologist allows discrimination of operation-induced reactions from tumor areas and leads to safe operation.
Angiosarcomas are very rare but highly malignant soft tissue tumors derived from the vascular endothelium.
The tumor is most commonly found in the skin.
The cancer is known to cause early and widespread metastases leading to a very poor prognosis of less than 24 months.
The therapy of choice is radical surgery followed by adjuvant radiation.
Background: Lipoprotein (a) is an important codominantly inherited risk factor for coronary disease but there is little data about its distribution in childhood.
Despite the important role of lymph node infiltration for the classification and prognosis of non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC), no standards exist to evaluate the quality of mediastinal lymphadenectomy.
Researches at several centers are not convinced that complete ipsilateral lymphadenectomy is necessary.
We investigated 270 consecutive patients undergoing a potential curative operation for NSCLC including complete ipsilateral lymph node dissection in order to ascertain whether or not there is a correlation between tumor localization and lymph node infiltration.
Patients were classified into the UICC (1987) stages I (n = 115), II (n = 42), and IIIa (n = 113).
In patients with N1-positive lymph nodes (n = 61) we found higher 5-year survival for patients with only intrapulmonary lymph node infiltration (39 %) than for patients with hilar infiltration (21 %).
Patients with N2 disease showed skip metastases in up to 81 % of cases.
We found that no tumor location predicted the lymph node infiltration.
Due to the variability of lymph node infiltration and the frequently occurring skip metastases, complete ipsilateral lymphadenectomy should be the standard for curative operations for NSCLC.
The muscles should be viewed as a response member in functional and structural disorders as well as in central control.
This second part of the article will attempt to show not only that the muscles are representing an interesting and sensitive information pool for disorders in the motoric system, but also that lesions in specific leg and hip muscles have an effect on the pelvis and spine and even on scapular mobility.
Purpose: The aim of the study was to apply laparoscopic techniques in reconstructive procedures for aortoiliac occlusive disease.
Methods: From February 1996 to February 1998, 16 patients underwent a laparoscopic aortobifemoral bypass procedure (ABF) using the transperitoneal approach.
Six, 5 to 12 mm ports were needed to dissect, cross-clamp and divide the infrarenal aorta using specific laparoscopic devices.
The aortic anastomosis was made end-to-side.
A long curved clamp was then passed from each groin to draw the limbs of the graft into the femoral incision.
The distal anastomosis was then performed conventionally.
Results: The laparoscopic ABF was performed successfully in 13 of 16 cases.
Three times a conversion to open surgery was requested.
One patient developed respiratory insufficiency requiring prolonged treatment on the ICU.
Mean operative time was 292 +/- 60 min; the aorta was crossclamped for 74 +/- 18 min.
Two patients needed transfusions of red blood cells.
In the study group, blood loss averaged 566 +/- 434 ml.
The bypass patency and the correct positioning of the graft were assessed by angiography.
The patients were discharged 9 +/- 5.8 days after surgery.
At follow-up after 4.5 +/- 4 months, 15 patients were examined noninvasively in the vascular laboratory.
All grafts were patent, and the ischemic symptoms had resolved in 14 patients.
One patient with recurrent claudication had severe stenosis of the left distal anastomosis.
Conclusions: The laparoscopic aortobifemoral bypass is a feasible, safe and effective procedure.
Specific laparoscopic instruments are required for the challenging procedure.
The development of vascular staplers and retraction devices will probably reduce the operative time and the technical challenge.
In the future this operative technique may gain relevance as a minimally invasive procedure for severe aortoiliac occlusive disease.
A 12 year old boy developed the complete symptom complex of Adamantiades-Behçet's disease over a two-year period.
He presented with the mucocutaneous variant with recurrent to persistent oral ulcers which extended into the pharynx, recurrent genital ulcers, perianal lesions, and a positive pathergy test.
Ocular involvement and other  symptoms associated with the disease were absent.
However, the early onset of the  disease and the male gender indicated a bad prognosis.
The patients father deficiency of suffered from bronchial asthma with recurrent respiratory infections.
An IgG-3 subclass was detected.
Lymphocyte transformation tests showed markedly diminished response to stimulation with anti-CD3 monoclonal antibody in both patients, while response to PWM, CoA and PHA was normal.
In addition, the concentration of serum soluble interleukin 6 receptor was reduced in both patients.
A polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay for the detection of dermatophytes was established.
The primers "TR1" and "TR2" amplify a 581 bp fragment within the gene coding for the small ribosomal subunit (18S rRNA) of fungi.
PCR allowed the detection of isolates of 7 common dermatophytes and in addition several yeasts and moulds.
Hybridisation with specific oligonucleotides results in the identification of dermatophytes and Candida albicans.
Restriction analysis of the PCR product allowed us to distinguish between dermatophytes and yeasts or moulds.
The specifity of the PCR with respect to fungi was assessed by testing human DNA collected from 42 dermis and epidermis specimens as well as DNA from selected plants and animals.
To evaluate the clinical relevance of the PCR assay, 69 routinely collected skin and nail specimens were examined by PCR and culture.
PCR detected dermatophytes in 35 and culture in 28 of 38 specimens that were classified as positive.
Sensitivity of PCR (92%) was higher than that of culture (73%).
These results show that PCR has advantages over culture for the detection of dermatophytes.
Starting with the recommendations of the "Psychiatrie-Enquête", a current empirical stock-taking was undertaken about the structure of care in psychiatric hospital units.
319 treatment units (289 in Germany, 11 in Austria, and 19 in Switzerland) were investigated concerning size of the treatment unit, number of wards, centrality of admission, existence of large observation rooms ("Wachsäle"), spezialized wards, single sex wards, regionalization/sectorization, open-door wards, coercive measures, and intended structural changes.
The return rate of questionnaires amounted 59%.
The results show that the recommendations of the "Psychiatrie-Enquête" are mostly realized today, but not everywhere.
Across countries differences resulted in size of ward, centrality of admission, open-door wards, and coercive measures.
Treatment units in the western and eastern parts of germany differed in size of ward and centrality of admission.
Differences between psychiatric hospitals, psychiatric departments at general hospitals and psychiatric university hospitals were, though significant, smaller than expected in the light of past controversies.
Intended structural changes mainly concerned open-door wards, internal sectorization, decentralization of admission, and mixing the sexes in single sex wards.
Background: The ciliary sulcus as the intended location of transsclerally fixated posterior chamber lenses (PCL) is withdrawn from the surgeon's view.
Using high-resolution ultrasound, we acquire pictures that postoperatively allow us to determine the position of the haptics.
Many patients would like to resume some sport activities after total knee replacement; however, most recommendations are based on subjective opinion rather than scientific evidence.
Background: Considering the high recurrence rate after conventional inguinal hernia repair, the totally preperitoneal endoscopic inguinal hernia repair has been used.
Methods: The present experience of the authors embraces 1085 patients with a total of 1717 inguinal hernias, including 200 recurrences.
The operative technique is described with emphasis on pitfalls and tricks.
Results: Analysis of the data concerning the first 403 patients with 1 year complete follow-up reveals a mean (SEM) operating time of 42 (1.2) min for unilateral and 58 (1.0) min for bilateral hernia repair.
Mean (SEM) postoperative hospital stay was 2 (0.04) days.
Complication rates during and after operation were 0.3 % and 3.3 % respectively.
The morbidity rate at 1 month after operation was 3.5 %.
The recurrence rate was 0.3 % at 1-year follow-up.
Conclusion: Totally preperitoneal endoscopic inguinal hernia repair is safe and reproducible for any type of primary or recurrent inguinal hernia, even in patients with previous subumbilical surgery or severe systemic disease.
Careful follow-up is mandatory to assess the late recurrence rate.
Background: The aim of this study was to evaluate prospectively whether there are differences in spectrometrically measurable parameters of the fundus between patients with early and late age-related maculopathy (ARM), the children of the ARM patients (F1 generation) and normals.
In approximately 4-10 % of patients presenting with renal cell cancer the transluminal propagation of a tumor thrombus into the vena cava inferior or the right atrium comes to diagnosis.
Recent investigations have indicated that the presence of neoplastic extension into the venous system does not reveal independent prognostic value regarding the clinical course of the disease.
Although the complete surgical removal of vena cava thrombosis in patients without simultaneously occurring regional lymph node or distant metastases has become a well established treatment modality, several questions concerning this surgical strategy still remain the subject of ongoing discussions.
In the present investigation that included 92 patients with renal cell cancer and intracaval neoplastic extension it was clearly demonstrated that the use of cardiopulmonary bypass, deep hypothermia and circulatory arrest preferably during the removal of intracaval thrombosis extending into the right atrium does not result in a substantially increased treatment-related intra- or postoperative mortality.
However, in contrast to a previously reported observation this treatment option did not reveal any substantial impact on the long-term survival of the patients following surgical therapy.
Accordingly, the cranial extension of intracaval thrombosis was not identified as a biological variable of any prognostic importance for renal cell cancer patients.
Vascular surgery or penile prosthesis implantation are the main surgical options for erectile dysfunction.
In this category, penile revascularization is the only causal therapy for selected patients: males younger than 50 years of age at time of surgery, maximum of two risk factors, exclusion of diabetes mellitus.
Long-term success decreased to 53 % to 55 % in comparison to first encouraging reports of 80 % success.
Venous surgery resulted in an even more distinct decline of success the longer the elapse of time after surgery.
Long-term success dropped under 40 %, leaving only a few indications for penile venous ligation.
In contrast, penile prosthesis implantation results in high satisfaction rates.
Despite this, it is not generally recommended as first choice surgical management as it is linked to irreversible damage of the cavernosal bodies.
Among numerous types of penile implants, preference is nowadays mostly given to the three-piece hydraulic models.
However, such complications as defective or perforated cylinders in up to 35 % after 5 years have arisen, depending on the type of implant.
In a selected patient group, vacuum constriction devices with a mean patient acceptance of 75 % (50 % to 90 %) seldom result in complications and are thus considered to be a well-established therapeutical option.
It has been suggested that anhedonia, the loss of pleasure, is associated with a dysfunction of the dopaminergic reward system in schizophrenic and alcohol-dependent patients.
In a series of neuroendocrinological and brain imaging studies, we examined pre- and postsynaptic mechanisms of dopaminergic neurotransmission in non-human primates and in schizophrenic and alcohol-dependent patients.
Among alcoholics, we found indicators of a sensitization of dopaminergic neurotransmission, which was associated with the relapse risk, but not with anhedonia or depression.
Schizophrenics with neuroleptic blockade of striatal dopamine D2 receptors displayed psychomotor slowing and reduced motivation, but not anhedonia.
Primate studies pointed to the importance of a temporo-cortical dysfunction in the pathogenesis of phasic dopaminergic dysregulation in the striatum.
These observations indicate that a dysfunction of stimulus-dependent dopamine release may be associated with motivational deficits caused by a reduction in incentive salience, but not with anhedonia.
Any operation for lung cancer that is planned as curative includes dissection of the lymph nodes in the mediastinum in order to allow correct staging of the disease.
It is well known that ipsilateral lymph node metastases (N2) mean a poor prognosis.
Since most patients with this finding die from metastatic tumor progression within 3 years after the operation, it can be assumed that positive findings in the mediastinal lymph nodes represent generalization of the cancer.
Therefore, the probability of a therapeutic effect from more radical removal of lymph nodes in the mediastinum is rather low.
On the other hand, it is justified to apply and evaluate additional systemic treatment in these tumor stages.
In analogy with high-dose contrast-enhanced CT, there have been a few studies during recent years that have dealt with high-dose paramagnetic contrast dyes in MRI.
One reason for these studies was the development of new and low-osmolar contrast agents in the MR field.
Depending on the clinical problem, a high-dose contrast study in MRI is rarely indicated: (1) in metastatic disease, MR imaging with high-dose contrast material is indicated when the standard dose study is negative or only shows a solitary cerebral lesion or a number of lesions just suitable for radiosurgery; (2) in patients with malignant glioma the high-dose study allows better definition of the tumor margins.
If a radical surgical approach is planned, the diagnostic potential should be fully used; if only a biopsy or subtotal debulking is planned, a standard dose study is enough.
(3) in patients with MS, a high-dose study is only recommended within therapeutic trials in which the number of active plaques is a primary variable.
The basic idea of the Collaborative Family Health Care is nothing new.
It has its roots in the bio-psycho-social model of medicine developed by George Engel in the U.S.A. and it has a long tradition in the German psychosomatic medicine.
At a time of basic changes in our health care system caused by cost considerations owing to the cutting back of resources it is important to note, that Collaborative Family Health Care combines aspects of theoretical models and pragmatic action-orientation.
The basic is a systemic view of illness and health.
The doctor-patient-dyad is in this view enlarged to a treatment-triad composed of the therapist, the patient and his family, to be able to bundle the whole potential at disposal, i.e.
the treatment motivation of the patient, the support of the family and the expertize of the therapist.
A lot of studies support the resource- saving potential of coopertive methods.
However, their realization is not possible without considerable learning processes of physicians, psychotherapists and other  professionals.
A potential has to be mobilized, which affects by no means only the costs.
The Collaborative Family Health Care offers new challenges to the professional culture of psychotherapists and new chances for influencing the world of medical health care.
At a time of obviously reduced professional solidarity, the iniitiatives of CFHC offer a possibility for physicians, patients and their relatives to reach contentment through cooperation.
Interested colleagues are invited to collaborate in the German Section of the CFHC.
We evaluated the short- to mid-term results of an unconstrained total ankle prosthesis (S. T. A. R.) with uncemented fixation.
Fifty consecutive ankle replacements were performed in 48 patients between 1996 and 1999.
The initial diagnosis was posttraumatic osteoarthrosis in 31 cases (62 %), primary osteoarthrosis in 8 cases (16 %), and systemic joint affection in 11 cases (22 %), e. g. rheumatoid arthritis (6 cases), hemochromatosis (2 cases), psoriasis arthritis (1 case), lupus erythematodes (1 case), and sclerodermia (1 case).
There were two perioperative complications: one superficial wound dehiscence that healed uneventfully, and one injury to the dorsal foot artery that necessitated primary reconstruction.
Seven revisions, all in cases of posttraumatic arthrosis, were necessary: local revision of the fibula for painful lateral impingement (3 cases), posteromedial soft tissue revision for painful restriction of dorsiflexion (2 cases), percutaneous lengthening of the Achilles tendon (1 case), and osteotomy and callus distraction for angular correction after stress fracture of the distal tibia (1 case).
At the last follow-up control, 21 patients (62 %) were very satisfied, 10 patients (29 %) were satisfied, and 3 patients (9 %) were satisfied with reservations.
The obtained range of motion was 30  ° (range, 15 to 55  °), with a maximal plantarflexion of 25  ° (range, 15 to 45  °) and dorsiflexion of 5  ° (-3 to 20  °).
When the AOFAS-Hindfoot-Score was applied, the 34 patients scored 84.1 points (range, 44 to 100 points).
After settling of the implants within 6 weeks, no migration was noted in any case, and all implants were considered to be stable.
The favorable results were considered to be a result of the mechanical properties of the S. T. A. R. total ankle prosthesis that allows for unconstrained motion of the polyethylene inlay on the tibial component, e. g. anteroposterior translation, mediolateral translation and axial rotation.
The success of implantation may depend on exact technique, correct hindfoot alignement, sufficient capsuloligamentous stability of the ankle, and a solid bone stock.
Although our first results are very encouraging, a longer follow-up is mandatory to answer the question whether ankle replacement is a viable alternative to ankle arthrodesis.
In a prospective study, the influence of the status of the peri-implant hard and soft tissues on the success of enosseous dental implants in tumor patients was assessed.
Out of 59 tumor patients with 261 implants, treated between July 1988 and August 1996, a pool of 23 patients with 99 implants provided with dentures for at least 1 year was obtained.
Eighteen of these patients suffered from a squamous cell carcinoma of the oral cavity.
Seventeen patients underwent preoperative radiation (40 Gy).
A total of 68 out of 99 implants were inserted into autologous bone transplanted to reconstruct the mandible.
In order to assess the peri-implant hard and soft tissues, the Hygiene Index, the Sulcus Bleeding Index, the Gingiva Index, the pocket-probing depth, the peri-implant bone resorption, and the periotest were used.
The results in the tumor patients were compared with the results in a pool of nontumor patients.
Tumor patients had significantly worse peri-implant parameters than nontumor patients.
The peri-implant pocket-probing depth proved to have significant influence on the success rate.
The overall success rate was 77.8%.
Many articles in the literature document the fact that postoperative pain therapy has not improved for decades despite new insights into pain physiology, the availability of powerful analgesics and the development of new techniques.
This project was set up to develop practical, effective, safe, and easy to run acute pain therapy.
A 26-year-old man sustained a C2 arc fracture.
Ventral spondylodesis using an H-plate was performed.
The patient developed a pharyngovertebral fistula which remained undetected for 1 year.
Spontaneous fusion of C3/C4 and osteolysis of the cortical block occurred.
The fistula was demonstrated intraoperatively and the implant was transorally removed.
No further problems occurred after this unusual method of treatment.
The anatomy of the cervical spine, special problems of intensive care patients and the use of proper instrumentation are discussed.
An interscalene block of the brachial plexus was combined with general anaesthesia for repair of a complex chronic lesion of the shoulder.
The localisation of the plexus with electro-stimulation and the injection of Bupivacain 0.5% were accomplished easily and without painful sensations.
48 hours later the block was still partially present.
Paraesthesia and a sensory and motor innervation deficit affected mainly the dorsal fascicle, but also areas innervated by the median and lateral fascicles.
The deficit did not completely disappear for 18 month.
The cause could have been due to direct traumatisation during blockade or operation, toxic action of the injected substance (Bupivacain 0,5%, 30 ml), distension of the plexus, a cervical syndrome or an aseptic plexitis, although a definite determination is not possible.
However, the pattern of the lesion and the lack of pain during localisation of the plexus and injection favour traumatisation during the acromioplasty.
Microfilm photography allows documentation of naevi in a map-like fashion.
The localization of multiple naevi is no longer a problem, as one can scan the film.
Comparison of the magnified film with the patient can be done in day-light.
Magnification up to 48 times is possible.
Detection of early changes of the naevi, during the horizontal growth phase, should increase the 5-year survival rate.
In the ancient times, Aristotle, Herophilos, and Galen discovered basic anatomical structures.
Paul von Aegina, in the seventh century a. c., had the idea of a nerve suture, which was first performed in an animal 1000 years later by the Italian surgeon Gabriele Ferrara.
Systematic investigations on nerve crossing date to the beginning of the nineteenth century and were conducted by Jean Pierre Flourens.
Within 1 week in summer 1864, two French surgeons (Laugier and Nélaton) independently carried out the first nerve sutures in humans.
Their observations of an immediate functional recovery of the appropriate muscles after suturing were discussed controversially in scientific circles.
Purpose: To analyze the value of electrophysiologic testing according to standards of the International Society for Clinical Electrophysiology of Vision (ISCEV) in infants less than 10 years of age.
Aggressive angiomyxoma (AAM) is a tumor of the soft tissues predominantely occurring in the genital and pelvic area with a strong propensity to local recurrences.
The entity was first described in 1983.
The tumor is regarded as low-grade sarcoma by some authors; its cause and pathogenesis are presently unknown.
This is a case report on a 27-year-old man who underwent 4 surgical procedures of the left lower extremity because of a recurrent soft tissue neoplasm, initially (August 1993) diagnosed as a myxolipoma.
The patient suffered from recurrences in February 1995, September 1996 and February 1998.
The diagnosis was revised at the time of the latest recurrence.
A palliative resection with macroscopic residuals left was performed in February 1998, followed by a radiation therapy with 56 Gy total dose and a concomitant administration of the radiosensitizer razoxane per os.
The single radiation doses were 200 cGy 5 times a week.
The small residuals of the tumor obviously regressed although an objective response could not be shown because the lesion was not clearly measurable.
A follow-up 2 years after the radiation treatment revealed no recurrence.
The time of the local control achieved as yet is already longer than any former time to regrowth between the surgical procedures.
This is, to our knowledge, the first description of a therapeutic irradiation of a recurrent aggressive angiomyxoma.
Radiation therapy combined with the sensitizer razoxane is able to control a recurrent AAM for an unknown time.
It remains open whether a radiation treatment alone would have had a similar effect.
Micronervereconstruction of motor and sensitive nerves in the head and neck area today has an established range of indications.
Surgical procedures of external and internal neurolyses, nerve coaptation and nerve transplantation techniques are well standardized.
With microneurosurgery of motor nerves, satisfying or good results can be generally obtained.
Success rates exceeding 50% following sensitive nerve reconstructions justify the performance of the procedures, more so because of the subjective improvements for the individual patient.
Perspectives can be seen in further simplification of surgical methods of harvesting nerve grafts, e.g., by development of minimally invasive, eventually endoscopically guided procedures.
Allogenic nerve grafts may also be applied.
Initial experiments with nerve distractions are encouraging.
A better understanding of nerve lesions on cellular and molecular biological levels may improve our knowledge of posttraumatic regulatory procedures and may lead to future possibilities of nonsurgical treatment options for peripheral and central nerve lesions by guided regeneration.
Objective: The acceptance of fibromyalgia as a disease entity and its definitive diagnosis have been hampered by a dearth of knowledge concerning the underlying pathophysiology of this disease and the lack of specific biochemical markers applicable to its diagnosis.
To determine whether abnormal collagen metabolism is a characteristic of fibromyalgia, we have analyzed collagen metabolites in the urine and serum of patients with fibromyalgia.
Methods: The diagnosis of fibromyalgia was made according to the American College of Rheumatology criteria.
Urine and serum were collected under standardized conditions from 39 patients and 55 age- and sex-matched controls.
Pyridinoline (Pyd) and deoxypyridinoline (Dpyd), which represent products of lysyl oxidase-mediated cross-linking in collagen and are indicators of connective tissue and bone degradation, respectively, were analyzed by ion-paired and gradient HPLC method with fluorescence detection (HPLC).
Levels of hydroxypyroline (Hyp), a collagen turnover marker, were also measured.
The findings were related to creatinine levels and the Pyd/Dpyd ratio determined.
The Pyd/Dpyd ratios in the urine and serum and the Hyp in the urine were significantly lower in patients with fibromyalgia than in healthy controls.
Conclusion: Decreased levels of collagen cross-linking may contribute to remodeling of the extracellular matrix and collagen deposition around the nerve fibers in fibromyalgia and contribute to the lower pain threshold at the tender points.
Analysis of altered collagen metabolism either by histologic examination on biopsy or, preferably, by HPLC analysis of collagen metabolites in urine or serum may aid to understand more about the pathogenesis of fibromyalgia.
Background: The dynamic radionuclide nephrography (Tc99m-MAG3) is an important method in the evaluation of obstruction of the upper urinary tract.
The aim of the present study was to assess whether radionuclid nephrography under standardized conditions with adequate hydration and Furosemid induced diuresis can reliably detect a significant obstruction at the pelvi-ureteric junction.
We therefore tested whether minimal tracer washout (10-25%) in the presence of normal renal function could justity a non-operative managment.
The lateral decubitus position is the standard position for nephrectomies.
There is a lack of data about the effects of this extreme position upon respiratory mechanics and gas exchange.
In 20 patients undergoing surgery in the nephrectomy position, we compared a new closed-loop-controlled ventilation algorithm, adaptive lung ventilation (ALV), which adapts the breathing pattern automatically, to the respiratory mechanics with conventionally controlled mandatory ventilation (CMV).
The aims of our study were (1) to describe positioning effects on respiratory mechanics and gas exchange, (2) to compary ventilatory parameters selected by the ALV controller with traditional settings of CMV, and (3) to assess the individual adaptation of the ventilatory parameters by the ALV controller.
The respirator used was a modified Amadeus ventilator, which is controlled by an external computer and possesses an integrated lung function analyzer.
In a first set of measurements, we compared parameters of respiratory mechanics and gas exchange in the horizontal supine position and 20 min after changing to the nephrectomy position.
In a second set of measurements, patients were ventilated with ALV and CMV using a randomized crossover design.
The CMV settings were a tidal volume of 10 ml/kg body weight, a respiratory rate of 10 breaths/min, an I:E ratio of 1:1.5, and an end-inspiratory pause of 30% of inspiratory time.
With both ventilation modes FiO2 was set to 0.5 and PEEP to 3 cm H2O.
During ALV a desired alveolar ventilation of 70 ml/kg KG - min was preset.
All other ventilatory parameters were determined by the ALV controller according to the instantaneously measured respiratory parameters.
Positioning induced a reduction of compliance from 61.6 to 47.9 ml/cm H2O; the respiratory time constant shortened from 1.2 to 1.08 s, whereas physiological dead space increased from 158.9 to 207.5 ml.
On average, the ventilatory parameters selected by the ALV controller resembled very closely those used with CMV.
However, an adaptation to individual respiratory mechanics was clearly evident with ALV.
In conclusion, we found that the effects of positioning for nephrectomy are minor and may give rise to problems only in patients with restrictive lung disease.
The novel ALV controller automatically selects ventilatory parameters that are clinically sound and are better adapted to the respiratory mechanics of ventilated patients than the standardized settings of CMV are.
Noma is an ulcerative-necrotizing gingivo-stomatitis eventually leading to severe destruction of the midface, including lips and cheek, maxilla/mandible, nose and rarely the orbit.
The defects are usually unilateral.
Children from economically underdeveloped countries are predominantly affected.
Medically untreated the disease has a high mortality rate, which can be dramatically lowered by adequate antibiotic therapy started in time.
Predisposing factors include malnourishment, immunosuppression, and poor oral hygiene.
Forty-eight noma patients were surgically treated in Sokoto, Nigeria during October 1997 by an Interplast Germany team sponsored by AWD Stiftung Kinderhilfe.
Interdisciplinary surgical strategies and results, e. g. ankylosis release, local flap coverage and 12 pedicled musculocutaneous latissimus dorsi island flaps, as well as a noma classification (NOMAC), are presented.
During a period of 3 years, four controled clinical studies in 34 patients with hypercholesterolaemia and 40 healthy persons - in some cases with stratification of the basic cholesterol levels and matched pair formation - were performed to find out the effects of serial sun-like UV irradiation on various serum parameters and blood circulation functions.
The following significant effects were observed.
Patients with hypercholesterolaemia: increase of HDL cholesterol after termination of the serial UV irradiation, increase of serum 25 (OH)D3 levels, decrease of serum triiodothyronine, decrease of serum lactate; healthy persons: decrease of resting pulse rate, decrease of recovery pulse rate, decrease of systolic blood pressure.
All effects were induced by application of suberythematous UV doses, i.e.
amounts of UV with a relatively low risk of side effects.
In 1998 Minor et al.
described a new variant of perilymphatic fistula: the "superior canal dehiscence syndrome".
This syndrome is clinically characterized by recurrent attacks of vertigo and oscillopsia induced by loud noises or stimuli that result in changes in intracranial or middle ear pressure.
It is caused by a dehiscence of bone overlying the superior (anterior) semicircular canal.
Due to this dehiscence, a third, mobile window (in addition to the round and oval windows) is formed, and changes in pressure are pathologically transduced to the anterior semicircular canal.
In the present study we evaluated proprioceptive capabilities of the knee joint with a balance test and correlated these findings to parameters which document mechanical stability.
We compared 8 conservatively treated and 12 surgically treated patients with ACL-deficient knee joints with a control group of 12 subjects.
The balance test was performed with a Kistler force plate.
Both the conservatively treated and the surgically treated patients showed significantly higher deviations of their centre of gravity than the control group.
This was true not only for the injured leg but also for the noninjured contralateral leg.
The differences were most remarkable when comparing the entire distance of centre of gravity deviations during 10 s. Additionally, the conservatively treated patients interrupted the test procedure significantly more frequently than the other two groups.
We were not able to document any correlation between proprioceptive function and parameters for joint stability such as anterior drawer, Lachman, pivot shift and KT-1000 measurements.
The study examined the validity of psychometric measures for the assessment of driving ability in brain-damaged subjects.
116 patients with brain damage mainly of vascular and traumatic origin underwent  extensive neuropsychological examinations emphasizing attentional performance and visual perceptual speed and participated in a comprehensive on-road driving test.
Only 58% of the patients passed the driving test.
Attempts to predict the outcome of the driving test by discriminant analysis or cut-off procedures based on neuropsychological and/or other subject-related data yielded a maximum of 73% correct predictions.
In view of the frequent impairment in driving ability after brain damage and in view of the failure to reliably predict driving ability from psychometric test results, it is recommended that in each case an on-road driving test is given.
In the planning of laser surgery for ENT operations, the specialist is often consulted by the anesthesiologist to predict possible intubation problems.
Intubation problems in such operations can occur frequently due to the pathological findings present in the upper aerodigestive tract and the different constructions of laser-resistant endotracheal tubes.
The aim of this study was to determine if a known predictive parameter could have a sufficient sensitivity and specificity to reliably predict possible intubation problems for ENT-related laser surgery.
In a prospective study, 91 patients were included and the Mallampati-score modified by Samsoon and Young was analyzed and compared to a score describing the actual conditions of intubation.
The results showed a significant correlation (p <0.05, Chi-Square test).
However, the specificity was only 72% and the sensitivity of 60% was too low to be of practical use.
The results were independent of the endotracheal tube used.
Although use of the laser for ENT operations provides a special situation for the anesthesiologist, there is still no system that is sensitive and specific enough to be of practical use.
This problem is demonstrated in a literature  review.
The treatment of patients with deep vein thrombosis and pulmonary embolism with contraindications for a thrombolytic therapy is a therapeutic challenge.
We report on a 12 year old patient who was treated for large cell lymphoma according to NHL-BFM 95: Block AA protocol.
During his therapy, he developed a thrombosis of his right femoral vein and pulmonary embolism affecting the left segments 4, 5, 8, and 9.
Because of cerebral metastasis a fibrinolytic therapy was contraindicated.
Therefore, we performed a mechanical thrombectomy using the Amplatz thrombectomy device.
The postinterventional scintigraphy showed a markedly improved pulmonary perfusion; dopplersonography 4 months postinterventionally showed a patent right femoral vein.
Within this chapter, tumors which produce bone matrix (osteoid) or other bone-forming tissues, like cartilage, connective tissue, and cementum or originate within the bone marrow are described.
In addition, those lesions are mentioned which, according to the WHO, are typical for the jawbones and are therefore included within the 1992 WHO classification of odontogenic tumors.
Vascular and epithelial tumors which may also be observed in the jaws are not described.
All the lesions and tumors reported have in common a more or less similar clinical and radiological appearance.
A precise diagnosis, therefore, can only be established by a sufficient biopsy which should be seen by a pathologist with experience in this field.
In addition to clinical, radiological, and histological appearances, therapeutic necessities are described.
The data from recent publications are taken into account.
This presentation is based on the data collected within the reference registry of the German-Austrian-Swiss Study Group of Tumors of the Face and Jaws (DÖSAK) in Basel.
Between 1987 and 1996 302 patients were treated for colorectal liver metastases.
Out of this pool 252 completely documented cases were analysed.
Forty-five patients (18 %) of this population were 70 years or older at time of admission.
In this population 17 major resections and 8 minor liver resections were performed.
In 9 patients irresectable metastases were diagnosed during treatment of the primary tumor.
In 3 cases laparotomy had to be finished as exploration.
Eight patients were treated without surgery.
Mortality after liver resection was 4 %, morbidity 28 %.
The 5-year-survival-rate (Kaplan-Meier) of the R0 resected patients (n = 21) was 44 %.
Comparison between the elderly patients and the younger population shows no significant differences in type and extent of treatment or in stage of disease.
Survival, morbidity and mortality after liver resection also show no significant differences.
These results show that even in elderly patients liver resection for colorectal metastases can be performed efficently and with a curative intention.
The clinical course of 12 patients with mushroom poisoning was evaluated in order to define the parameters considered to be relevant to the indication for liver transplantation.
Eight patients recovered under conservative therapy; one patient died due to pre-existing, concomitant cardiopulmonary disease.
In three patients transplantations had to be performed because of severe liver failure.
On admission, the transplanted patients had a decreased Quick's test score and factor V value (< 10 %).
The peak of liver enzymes, serum bilirubin, serum creatinine, partial thromboplastin time and azotemia were not of any prognostic value.
Main indications for liver transplantation were a very low initial Quick's test score and factor V value (both < 10 %) and their inadequate response under substitution therapy.
The development of encephalopathy and renal failure were further parameters indicating poor prognosis.
During submaximal isotonic back extension loading (31 male persons) surface-EMG was measured using 16 monopolar-linked electrodes in the low back region (L 3-S 1).
By means of modification of amplitude- and frequency parameters in the EMG-signal two subject groups (6 persons each) with the slightest and most severe muscle fatigue in the paraspinal region were defined.
For the analysis of muscle coordination, the EMG signal on the basis of an amplitude estimate at the beginning and at the end of the load situation was compared.
During the extension phase, the group with slight fatigability showed no different spatial pattern of myoelectrical activity at the end of investigation than at the beginning.
In contrast to this, the pattern of myoelectrical activity changed during the endurance test in the group of persons with considerable fatigability.
Therefore, in addition to the muscular fatigue also the loss of muscle coordination has to be taken into account in the assessment of spinal function.
Background: A fractional flow reserve (FFRmyo) <0.75 is a well validated parameter for significance of coronary stenoses in cases of normal myocardial function.
We used the FFRmyo limit in patients with impaired myocardial perfusion by myocardial infarction and/or hypertension for intermediate stenoses of the LAD for decision to PTCA and checked the indication by clinical follow-up.
Distraction osteogenesis of the mandible is one treatment option in mandibular hypoplasia.
Usually, a non-continuous distraction mode is applied.
The aim of the present study was to establish continuous bone distraction using a microhydraulic cylinder.
Using a submandibular approach, the mandible was dissected subperiostally on one side in four mini-pigs; corticotomy was performed and the microhydraulic cylinder fixed with two bicortical screws.
The hydraulic tube was connected with an automatic hydropneumatic injector system.
Following 7 days at rest, a continuous distraction of 1.5 mm per day was performed for 14 days.
After 2 and 4 weeks postoperatively, the animals were killed and X-rays taken.
The mandible was then removed en bloc and microscopic evaluation of the sections was performed.
The microhydraulic cylinder was easy to apply and to handle.
The continuous stimulus did induce direct mineralisation of longitudinal oriented collagenous fibre bundles.
Bony regeneration seems to be accelerated, which might reduce the postoperatively stabilizing phase.
The duration of spinal anaesthesia in infants is short compared to adult patients.
When tetracaine is used, the addition of epinephrine significantly prolongs the duration.
For bupivacaine, however, the influence of epinephrine on the duration is not clear.
We investigated the effects of epinephrine 1: 200 000 added to bupivacaine 0.5% on duration and haemodynamics.
Ten former pre-term infants with postnatal respiratory problems, scheduled for bilateral inguinal hernia repair, were enrolled in the study after informed parental consent had been obtained.
The infants were fasted at least 4 h prior to surgery.
If they did not receive i.v.
infusions before surgery, a bolus of 10 ml/kg Ringer's acetate was injected after inserting the i.v.
cannula, followed by a continuous infusion of 8 ml/kg 2/3 N NaCl with 5% dextrose.
Spinal anaesthesia was performed in a sitting position with 0.6 ml bupivacaine 0.5%.
Five patients received plain bupivacaine (group I) and five bupivacaine with epinephrine 1: 200 000 (group II).
Heart rate registered by ECG and non-invasive blood pressure were recorded prior to positioning the baby for lumbar puncture and 2, 5, 10, and 20 min after injection of bupivacaine.
The duration of spinal anaesthesia was defined as the time from injection to the time when the first movements of the legs were observed after stimulation.
For testing statistical differences the U test was used between the groups and the Wilcoxon and Wilcox test within the groups.
Results (expressed as median and range).
Additional epinephrine significantly prolonged the duration of spinal anaesthesia (group II: 95 min [60 - 120] vs group I: 50 min [37 - 85]).
Haemodynamic parameters did not differ at any time between or within the groups.
In group I, one infant had high spinal anaesthesia with impaired respiration but without cardiovascular effects; after 10 min of assisted ventilation by mask, sufficient respiration as judged by pulse oximetry and clinical observation had returned.
The duration of spinal anaesthesia in this child was 60 min.
Epinephrine 1: 200 000 significantly prolongs the duration of spinal anaesthesia in former preterm infants.
Haemodynamic parameters in this age group remain unchanged during spinal anaesthesia and are not influenced by the addition of epinephrine.
Purpose: Debate about the potential implementation of Spiral-CT in diagnostic algorithms of pulmonary embolism are often focussed on sensitivity and specificity in the context of comparative methodologic studies.
We intend to investigate whether additional factors might influence this debate.
Familial dilated cardiomyopathy (DCM) should be an "evidence-based" diagnosis derived from clinical and echocardiographic screening of informed and consenting relatives of index patients, and on the examination of clinical reports for deceased relatives.
Most familial dilated cardiomyopathy pedigrees show an autosomal pattern of inheritance.
